Awesome place: awesome music, awesome jerk chicken, laidback relaxing place, reggae music, a solid rum punch, and huge, huge portions! Winston is a great host and always keeps the spirits up in the place. Come here late in the afternoon (probably the only time when its empty) and sit back and relax caribbean style. Their lunch platters are huge portions, the wraps are usually good enough for lunch. Usually get the Tobago special with chicken - Yeahman!
The atmosphere was about the best thing I experienced while I was here. To start off, the cook is the bartender, the waiter, and the owner--seriously felt like I was in the movie, "Are we there yet." For those that have seen it recall the white real estate that wore far too many hats! There were not too many other people in the restaurant, but for whatever reason it took a very long time to receive our order and when we finally did we were not happy--a few of the people I was with actually switched plates! I ordered the shrimp appetizer and expected the shrimp to be prawn like in size, but what I was given was standard size shrimp that I could've bought at the supermarket. Needless to say I was very disappointed, as I had never experienced Jamaican food before and hope that the next time I do, I will get the true experience. I will say the owner and his son were quite friendly and you couldn't help, but to feel bad for them, as they took on too many roles.  :(
Dirty, flat and generally unfriendly.These are the unfortunate words that pop into my mind when I recall my first and *last meal here. The sidewalk table we sat at was covered in street exhaust. The waiter came over to us, with a somewhat dour, lifeless look/attitude, and handed me my filthy, sauce covered menu. Yuck!!! I had to ask him to clean the table, to which he gave me a "what?" kind of look. We didn't even receive a friendly "hi, how are you today"? or "is this your first time here? welcome!" small talk...He looked like he just came from an audit... BUT, once he went back into the main, indoor part of his restaurant, he sparkled, gabbed, and laughed with his lone, female customer who he was chatting up a storm with aka flirting with...  so lame and transparent ;-p I even thought the sign on the table requesting "anonymous customer feedback" was a bit laughable after I found out after my questions to our waiter was that he was the OWNER... Really? 23 years in the business and your place comes across as dirty AND you don't make the basic effort to communicate in a friendly, decent manner with who are obviously (potentially long term) new customers? Also, shouldn't it be standard practice to clean your outdoor tables the minute a new customer sits down to eat there? The tables get covered in grim/exhaust quickly, being that they are out on a busy street. Can't you make the extra effort, especially when you have no real customers, except for US??? The kicker, and what prompted me to write this not so nice review, was when his lady friend from the inside of the restaurant was gone, and he had no one else to flirt with, AND it was bill paying time aka time to leave a tip that he magically "bloomed" and started to converse with us in a friendly, genuine tone. My, my, what a coincidence! How ironic that I was paying the bill and have been in the hospitality industry a looong time, so these last minute/cheap tactics unfortunately fell on flat ears/eyes. I painfully barely left a 15% tip (normally, I massively overtip). Oh, and about the food: The shrimp appetizer was absolutely laughable, with sIx of the TINIEST shrimp smothered in mystery sauce, and the TINIEST rice and veg portion I have ever seen, all for $6.50...? It was barely enough for a child, or my twelve pound terrier. And the ginger (hot) tea had apparently fresh ginger, but still managed to be weak and loaded with sugar. The jerk chicken and rice was decent, but the rice was clumpy/overcooked. I've made the same/better at home. Needless to say, we won't be going back here. Very unsatisfactory, sad experience, and a waste of $30+
I  just read with astonishment the nastiest and most petty review from an Angelica person. Why the need for this level of downright nastiness, is beyond me. I find this lady's mistaking Winston's kind hospitality as coming on to her, as sad and off-base.  As a regular, female, single patron (and not to bad looking, I might say) I have only experienced respectful treatment. Winston is personable and shows genuine and warm interest in others. My friends and I have been enjoying lunches and dinners at the Mango restaurant on Hamilton in Palo Alto on a weekly/twice-weekly basis for the past 8 years, and we have consistently found Winston, the owner, to be one of the most honorable, hardworking and dedicated hosts to his patrons, working extremely hard to provide his only son with the best education possible. Apart from the warm and personal service,  the food is wonderful and very Caribbean - spicy, fruity and unique. My favorites are his chicken curry and pumpkin soup (with real pumpkin from Jamaica). Not to mention the delicious mint tea and rum and raisin ice cream. I'm not really a drinker, but my friends always order the Jamaican beer, which apparently is quite robust with a nice kick. I can recommend this restaurant - host and all - most heartily. I encourage each and everyone to come and enjoy this truly inviting eatery. You will come back for more, I guarantee you.
Good food.  Wings appetizer is awesome.  I've been here 7 or 8 times and the service can be marginal at times.  Sometimes there isn't enough staff to handle the number of customers.  If you're not in a hurry you will enjoy the food and drinks.
Horrible service and very bad food. We'll never go back there again.
It's chill here and felt like we were on island time.  We weren't hungry so it's cool.  Servers were friendly.  Raggamuffin style oxtail was tender and got a kick to it.  Aruba jerk joints were only $4 on Thursdays and Saturdays. The meat fell off the bone.  Raggae Platter jerk chicken was very moist.  Had the sauces been less salty, the dishes would have tasted much better.  Found smudges in glasses.
I had a really bad experience here recently - the food was terrible. We had two entrees -- Runaway Bay (black pepper shrimp, beans and rice, plantains, fruit) and their Great Bay Shrimp (jerk shrimp, beans and rice, plantains, fruit). The shrimp on both of our dishes were tiny and heavily seasoned with pepper. There was no real taste to it. The plantains and their rice were both soggy and uneventful. It was such a waste of money that we walked out and went somewhere else. If you're into getting Caribbean in the area, Coconuts is a better option for a sit-down place and drinks. If you don't mind a grimier place but great food, I've heard Back A Yard is the best in the area.
Disclaimer - I am not Caribbean food expert and another Caribbean restaurant from close by has influenced my taste. This was my first visit and I am not coming back. Service - Pretty bad at least for today. When we came in, there were very few people in the restaurant. There was one person doing all things, I am assuming he was the owner. He was the Manager, Host, Server, Bus boy for the day. He got us seated, threw the menus on the table and left.  While I was waiting, I was reading the reviews and comments for fellow yelpers about this restaurant. After a few minutes, we are ready to place the order, since I had read some mixed reviews about the food, I asked the host for recommendations, he goes 'Everything is great here, so you can order anything' ..hmm... I try to be more specific, and ask for jerk chicken entrees, he gave me the option of Reggae Platter which apparently was quite popular. One of my friends ordered the same thing and another ordered a jerk chicken sandwich. After we finished our food, we had to wait for more than 10 minutes for the host to check on us, I can cut him some slack here, he was running around doing all the jobs himself. After some more time, we get the check... we put in our cards and more wait... another 10 minutes, when he finally gets to us, I try to explain on how we want the splits... at which he says 'I'll be right back..'.... few more minutes, he comes back, then I explain to him 'Two parts on card and One part on the other', I repeat ,and repeat and again repeat.. finally he gets it.... So for this service.. I don't know how to rate. Food - We got our food real quick, we were surprised. There were two other larger parties who were there ahead of us, so we had expected some delay in our food. Fortunately for us, we didn't have to wait, the others did. Coming to the food, A look at the plate and I lost half my appetite. The food was cold. The vegetables had absolutely no seasoning and looked like there were stale or could have been frozen vegetables. Couple of bites and I couldn't take it anymore. The rice and beans... was bland, absolutely no seasoning, and was overcooked. The jerk chicken... I was shocked, this was nothing closed to what I have seen before(Jerk chicken at other restaurants), again no seasoning at all. It looked like there was a lot of worcestershire sauce(am not really sure, it could be some other sauce, but it has to be dark in color with the same consistency as worcestershire ) and nothing else. I tried real hard to eat let alone enjoy. Couldn't eat more than half of the plate. For $12, I have had way better food at buffets. About the sandwich my friend had, I asked him if he would come back another day, he gave me a very sorry look.
Hosted my Meetup event here: Lots of drink specials and appetizers (fried plantains, wings, dried plantains and hot patties). The atmosphere was good with soothing sounds of Caribbean melodies. The Meetup was a success!
Great food, super reasonably priced. We had four entrees, two appys, and a bottle of wine for under $100. Wait staff was super friendly.
Good service, okayish food, tacky decor
This is a very cute lil spot on Hamilton Ave. I've been there a few times, and I continue to forget to Yelp. I went in there today with my sister. Winston the owner greeted us and made us feel very welcomed! Took the time to chat with us a bit too, which you don't see at bigger restaurants. Being from a very tropical country, this place reminded me of my hometown and that's always a plus. The vibe when you walk is is that this place is chill, very relaxing atmosphere with reggae music playing in the background, before you know it you are moving from side to side hehehe. We ordered some smoothies that were delicious, the Garland: mango, guanabana, pineapple and the Jamaican me Crazy: coconut, mango, banana smoothies, both very delicious! We had 2 chicken and 1 beef  Jamaican patties, both very good, but I think I liked the beef one a tiny bit more. My sister ordered the MOBAY  dish, a spicy pepper shrimp with fried plantains came with a side of rice too. It was delicious, but beware it is spicy, but we love spicy. The service was a bit slow, but I think it goes hand in hand with the atmosphere and care free spirit of the actual restaurant. My sis is already planning her birthday party there and we will for sure make it back for many more lunch dates.
I'll keep it simple.  Go to Coconuts Restaurant and Bar instead... it's MUCH better. http://www.yelp.com/biz/...
Very cool restaurant. Like those backpacker restaurants in Thailand etc. Love the interior & Caribbean music. The chef was super nice, came to the table to say hello and to shake your hands. Very friendly, also the rest of the staff. The Jamaican chicken patty was a bit spicy but good, the backyard soup was yummy too. The Tobago special (chicken pelau) was not the best but still good! So delish: grilled banana with rum sauce and coconut ice!! The prices are totally ok for what you get. I loved the whole atmosphere here. So calming!
Very cool restaurant. Like those backpacker restaurants in Thailand etc. Love the interior &... Read more 
Horrible. The service was slow, even though we were the only customers in the restaurant. My shrimp dish didn't taste anything at all (but had a weird aftertaste), the veggies were over cooked, and my husbands quesedilla was really bland and way too greasy. It was also rather expensive. Will not come back.
One of the worst places ive ever been. went there when it was empty on a saturday afternoon and got the jerk quesadillas whic was gross doey intensely greesy bread alot of cheap gross chese and chicken. The restaurant is pretty gross like a litte shack which would maybe be ok in a counttry in south america but definatly not here of in the Caribbean!! I was a little sceptical of this place and i wanted to just go running- and still do. the salad was good and the wraps didnt look bad. The owner is also  very friendly :) but the service is sssllloooowwww....
Our company comes by every Thursday as a group, love this place. $2 red stripe beers and great food. Winston really is a nice guy. The atmosphere has a festive feel with the colors and music. Admittedly, the service is a bit slow since Winston handles everything on his own.. taking orders, cooking, handling the bar, etc, but it doesn't  bother us. We've got great company with us to talk to while we wait and we come back every week! I try to get something new every time, the jerk chicken is great--- spicy, flavorful, and moist.
This was a true disappointment. I was eager to try Mango after trying out Coconuts, but maybe that's why the disappointment is so potent. The food was definitely sub-par and sloppy looking--with the exception of the meat patties--and the service was terrible. When we asked for our check, we were told we would need to wait another 15 mins because the owner was at the store...which may explain the bad service and long wait for our food in general. He did end up comping our appetizers and drinks that we never received, but there will be no repeats here.
Winston, the owner, is the heart and soul of this restaurant. He makes you feel at home as soon as you walk in and can also whip up a mean meal. This place is only one block off of University, but it is away from all of the downtown craziness so getting a table is much easier and the environment is much more relaxing. The flavors are unique and exciting and the prices are very reasonable. Favorite starters: Jamaican chicken patty, welcome hall (plantain chips) Favorite entres: Reggae wrap (basically a build your own Jamaican version of a fajitas platter with jerk chicken), Rasta Pea Cook Off with a side of Roti Bread, Tobago Special, Runaway Bay (SPICY!) Favorite drinks: Erin makes an amazing Rum Punch but I also love the big 24oz Red Stripes.
This little tucked away Jamaican gem makes me feel like I'm on vacation every time I come here. Wide wicker chairs, a small rum tiki bar and sea shells on the ceiling make me forget that I live in tech valley central. Winston, the owner, is welcoming and sincerely happy to see us whenever we walk through the door. We have been made part of the Mango family. The rum punches are delicious, although I do order them without the grenadine, as I'm not a big fan of sweet drinks. This way I get them refreshing and a tad sour. Be careful though, these go down like juice and you'll not notice how strong they are until a little while later. All food items are phenomenal. A few favorites are the beef and chicken patties and the jerk joints (all on happy hour special on Thursdays and Saturdays along with the rum punches and Red Stripe beer) for appetizers. These are great for sharing and you might just be tempted to order another round! The Grenada Greens salad with mango, avocado, and jerk chicken is my go-to entree during the summer months. You can also get it with jerk salmon or shrimp. During the "colder" California months, I opt for the No Problem Man soup - a hardy chicken broth with big chunks of jerk chicken, veggies, and dumplings. This soup cures any cold! It's Thursday, so I might just be there tonight ;-)
I have been reading so many reviews about this carribean joint and it has compelled me to write one of my very first reviews on this really great jamaican restaurant.  I am not sure what everybody is complaing about being "betrayed", the food taste great, service is good(maybe slow at times but that is the "jamaican way"..right beenie man? Anyways I have been here over 5 times and every time we have had a great authentic carribean meal ( not only am I from west indian background, I grew up in panama and have enjoyed many jamaican specialties in my time) U guys and gials need to help support your only few authentic west indian cuisine restaurants in the area instead of giving negative reviews over"  happy our times on their website" I am glad there are few that have the courage to open such A lovely resturant.
The place is dirty. The bottoms of the walls are black with dirt. One knife was dirty. Seating was comfy. Overall atmosphere, dirty but not filthy, colorful and exotic. The smoothies were excellent. The jerked joints tasted dry although they were served in a pool of watery black who-knows-what. The chicken was nearly black. The pastry on the pasties (meat turnovers) was underdone. The filling was pale and liquidy. I enjoyed the jerked salmon although it was a little crisp. The veggies were good. The plaintains were excellent. Basically, the plantains and smoothies were on par with the best you'd find anywhere. Everything else about the place....not so much. I will not be going back.
Before we started having kids, my wife and I used to frequent this place. The decor of this place, and the slight humidity kind of reminded me of being on a tropical island. Recently, I took a Friday off from work. Our youngest daughter was at day camp, and my wife and my oldest daughter was at home. It was near mid day, and the weather was nice. My wife and I thought it would be a good idea to head out for lunch (and have my daughter take a break from watching Korean soap operas on the laptop). We haven't been to Mango Caribbean for a long time, so we decided to check it out. We know this place changed owners. It was originally called "Mango Cafe" before they changed it to "Mango Caribbean Restaurant and Bar." We had no problem getting seated. The decor was pretty much the same as we remembered, and with the warm weather that day, it felt a bit tropical. The hostess/waitress handed us our menus. We looked it over, then the waitress came back to take our orders. About 10 minutes later, our food arrived: -Jamaican: This is a meat turnover. The ran out of frozen ones, that morning, so they made one fresh for us. The crust was nice and flaky. The meat was minced finely, if not mushy. Not bad tasting, though.. -Mi Good ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ): This is a goat curry, served with a side of rice and sauteed veggies. Nice tasting sauce, well spiced, but not to spicy. Meat was mild, but some pieces were tough and chewy. -Aruba ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ): The last time I had jerk joints from the previous owner, the wings were dry on the outside, moist on the inside, and very spicy. Though it was spicy, and the meat fell off the bone, wings were swimming in a jerk sauce. -Grenada Greens ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ): garlic shrimp, avocado, mango, with a lemon vinaigrette. Very colorful and refreshing salad. Non-Alcoholic Smoothies: These were made with nothing but fruit and ice. -Blue Mountain: strawberry, banana, passionfruit. Tasty and cold. My daughter like how this cooled her down after each bite of the jerk wings. -Lover's Leap: pineapple, orange, guava. Just as refreshing. Overall, this place was OK, but not as what I remembered last time. Not bad, I may come back again.
Curry and jerk wings are moist.  Try the goat curry.  If you like it spicy, and like to cool it off... Read more 
It's hard to believe that lunch here on a Friday is really slow. I waited 45 mins for my order. The sole chef in the kitchen was also the bartender, so he had to come out whenever another patron ordered a drink. There was only one waitress and 6 other tables to serve. I ordered the Soca Special, which is chicken curry with white rice and stir fried veggies.  The flavor of the curry had medium spiciness, and the chicken was ok. If the food was outstanding, I can probably forgive the slow service. But not this time.
I met a friend in this place, we were debating between this place and cocnuts (on ramona), but after he recommended it, and stated he's been a regular to this place we decided to go with Mango. (later I learned that he last has been to this place more than 2 years ago... I guess the place changed) We met for dinner. 1st bad signal - we were the only people in this place at 7pm. ignoring that signal we sat and ordered food. the appetizer (cod fish) was plainly horrible - deep fried, and yet was soaked with oil, flavorless, soggy and not good. for entre I ordered the jerk shrimps with plantains. the shrimps were obviously frosen flavorless shrimp, soft and mushy. the rise was dry and the plantains weren't crispy as they should have been. during the entire diner not a single person entered the place. I would highly recommend avoiding this place for dinner (and probably for lunch as well). will definitely not come back to this place ever again. If you are into caribbean/jamaican food, you should try coconuts on Ramona. I don't know how they are for dinner, but I had lunch and the food (jerk chicken, rise, plantains) was fresh and very tasty.
I've visited Jamaica countless times over the years and was excited to try this place. Unfortunately, it was a complete disappointment. My jerk chicken was bland, and the festival was a complete joke. It didn't taste like anything remotely close to the way festival tastes..and it's so easy to make, how could they go wrong! I will say that their plantains were good. Finally, the drinks were a complete waste of money. Terrible. Their female waitress needs to be sent or resent to bartending school before she attempts to make any more drinks! So I say, if you know nothing about Caribbean food you might find it to be just ok, but if you want the taste of real authentic island flavor, and delicious, addictive drinks, head over to Coconuts a few blocks away.
Went here because Coconuts was an hour long wait, but probably would have gotten our food earlier at Coconuts. Waitress forgot about our table (um, we were one of the maybe 5 tables there), food took about an hour to arrive (um, we were one of the maybe 5 tables there), smoothies were watery. I ordered a jerk sandwich, which arrived on what looked/tasted like cold Wonder bread. It was "interesting". Overall, okay food, but not as great a Coconuts/Back-A-Yard.
The reviews are all over the place because yelp is filled with opinions. I don't know how anyone can call Mango's food bland.  That's totally off. Mango has fantastic food (and it's consistent), the chill ambiance has laid back service and I find the servers to be good.  They earn their tips.  And of course, Winston who recently introduced himself to my cousin and I makes wicked rum punch with overproof rum.  It's not for the wimpy. Some of the lame yelpers for Mango seem like they could use some rum punch.  :)
Great little spot in an off-the-beaten track section of Hamilton Avenue. Had the soups before (good, spicy, and flavorful), but this time I ordered the reggae platter (jerk chicken, veggies, and rice) which was well-priced at 12 dollars. Drinks and smoothies were delicious. Festivals as a side ($3) were a highlight. They come drizzled with a bit of honey--a hearty Jamaican fried dough. I try the corn festivals at every Jamaican restaurant I go to, and these were among the very best. Great reggae music playing as well!
Do not be alarmed by the other yelpers bad reviews! I guess the saying "to each its own" stands true on this place! In my eyes and my tummy this place was a hidden gem. I came across it once when I worked next door. I walked in and it was a friendly ambiance, they had live reggae music. The feel is very low key, mellow and relaxing. The staff was super friendly and chatted with me for a while. Made me feel right at home! The decor is very nice and fits perfect. The service is slow but then again it goes with the vibe of the restaurant Hakuna Matata LOL I loved the food! you have to try the smoothies and the plantains.  I like this place best in the summertime but over all is a great place to go to! Again, check it out and make your own decision about the restaurant. Take it from me who knows a thing or two about Caribbean food... its good!
Pure heartbreak. I feel so cheated. I am sad, mad and upset. Like a cheated-on girlfriend sad. Mango, how could you do this to me?  I stood up for you. I said you were awesome.  But seems that you've changed and I can barely recognize the Mango I fell in love with.  I am afraid you won't be getting a second. but lets face it, it's your loss. On my recent (and last) trip Mango was AWFUL. The service was horrendous.  The waiter barely talked to us and when he did it was in one word sentences.  We ordered my (ex)favorites jerk chicken sandwich as well as the Retirement one.  Salmon was blech.   Chicken had zero flavor outside of the spice.  It took 45 minutes to get our two sandwiches - hardly complex dishes.   The Coconut smoothie was watery and I think I took two sips.  The rice and beans side was so dry I don't know how my son ate it.  But he is 2 and doesn't discriminate.  Lucky for Mango. The worst part is that I was appalled at all the bad reviews on Yelp and told my friend how Mango is AWESOME and we must go there.  Didn't I look like a fool.  Sorry Mango, I am taking my memories of better days and moving right along next time.
I love this place! I went on Yelp to check the exact address so that I can tell a friend to meet me... Read more 
FAIL! I will definitely not return. I was looking for a place to eat and came across this place which was empty except for 2 older white dudes at the bar trying to pick up on the waitress. I usually take an empty restaurant as a bad sign, but I wanted to give them the benefit of the doubt. Did the top of the pepper shaker become unscrewed during use? Everything tasted of black pepper. It was on everything, no joke, the salad greens, plantain chips, and veggies were covered in coarsely ground peppercorns. Perhaps I was mistakenly given the secret pepper lovers menu? The plantain chips appetizer came with some bland oxidized guacamole and some other strange watery sweet dip which did not taste like cucumber. The chips were okay, but that's hard to mess up. The goat curry ($13) was okay in flavor, but ruined by added pepper on top. The rice that it was served with was a total insult. It was white rice that was obviously old, stale, dry and reheated in the microwave probably more than once. How hard is it to cook a fresh batch of rice once a day and leave it in the rice cooker on warm? It came with a side of sauteed bell peppers and onion which was mediocre. The boston bay style sandwich ($8.5) was kind of sad. First of all, last time I checked, wonder white bread wasn't considered sourdough bread. Yep, sugary bbq shredded chicken covered in black pepper between white bread. It would help to at least toast the bread or something. Rice and beans were not very fresh tasting and the salad was okay. Did I mention that the menu says sourdough bread and that's what we asked for? The no problem man soup was probably the least problematic item in flavor even though it was missing one of the ingredients in the description - dumplings. We mention it to the waitress and she says "oh maybe he's going to bring them later or something, let me ask him", haha. After about 5 minutes she brings out a small bowl with some broth and a half raw piece of dough the size of a bean. WOW really? I think that I would feel better if they just said they ran out or they just didn't feel like making dumplings. If it wasn't for the good rum punch and the fast service I would probably rate it 1 star. It was very clear that there was no passion and minimal effort put into the food. I left feeling upset and jacked for $50.
Nothing special here. Move along. Go to Coconuts. After an afternoon of suffering through a failed product launch and drinking gobs of Belgian Beer, we needed food. My son is a big Reggae/Jamaica fan, so I suggested Coconuts. Our host knows Winston, the owner of Mango's, so we diverted. The atmosphere is nice and the service friendly. We definitely felt welcomed. I reluctantly grabbed a menu knowing my hands would no longer be sanitary after grasping the oily laminate. We ordered two appetizers: plaintains and jerk legs. The plaintains were thin and deep fried to a crisp but a bit sweet for my taste. I prefer them chunkier and almost charred by the grill. The cucumber sauce tasted refreshing while the avocado sauce tasted watery. The jerk legs arrived and I was surprised to find them stewed instead of grilled. They were tasty and tender but not what I expected. For dinner, we ordered the Reggae Platter and Mango Chicken: Reggae Platter: same stewed jerk chicken accompanied by tasteless beans and rice. R U kidding! How can Jamaican red beans and rice be tasteless? Not even a hint of spice? The veggies were fresh and nicely sauteed. Grand Caymen: A mango chicken with the same beans/rice and veggies. Chicken was breaded and fried then topped with a mango sauce. As tasty sweet as the mango sauce was, it could not overcome the bland chicken. Next time, we're going to Coconuts.
I recently had the jerk chicken and oxtail soup about a mont ago. The chicken and oxtail were tender and just fell apart in my mouth. Definitely well worth 5 stars alone. The red stripe beer was good as usual. I moved onto jerk chicken, rice, and vegetables. Again, the chicken was tender, spicy, and the portion was more than adequate. The service is good and the atmosphere is relaxing. Definitely worth a try, especially  with the warm weather months approaching.
To continue on with my mango themed day in Palo Alto, Phil and I headed over here to get some yummy Caribbean grub and mango mojitos before going to the show at City Lights Theater. It had been years since I last came here, mostly because the last couple of times I ate here, the lighting and temperature of the dining room made me nauseous. I was pleasantly surprised to know that all of that was adjusted, and I'm happy to say that I can enjoy dining here again. The portions are huge, so you can skip appetizers, dig into your main entree and still have leftovers. I had the jerk chicken platter, which had a major kick to it. The more bites I took, the spicier it got. It was delicious though, and I had my mango mojito to cool my mouth off. Those mojitos were strong! Just what I needed :) Service was friendly, though we had to work hard to get our server's attention even though there were hardly any tables. I think she figured that the loads of food and strong drinks would keep us chatty with each other. Loved the Sean Paul music, which is always cheesy but fun! http://www.youtube.com/w...
[spoken in a heavy patois accent] "Eh, fo' like nyami-nyami, come yah fo' Mango, but supm jess so-so, say'n?"* The short of it... Cool locale/interior, AWESOME AWESOME SERVICE, ... but the kitchen misses, IMO. The long of it... We arrived for Venus H.'s birthday, a party of 18 with a reservation, and were seated in a quarters that shouldn't be occupied by more than 14 comfortably.  But it was cozy and festive, if a little warm, and the hospitality from  the staff was awesome and welcoming from the get-go... The restaurant is homey and culturally immersive; wood, rattan, and bamboo furniture everywhere, the richly-colored walls ornamented in Caribbean kitch, a fishing net spread across the ceiling over the bar.  Though we noticed some track lighting and lamps overhead, they are left off to keep the mood intimate, illumination coming from candlelight and few incandescent sconces. The music playing on Friday night was a soundtrack of noteworthy hip-hop.  On Saturday, (...yes, I went twice in a row; took mom and gramma out for an early Momma's Day, and they wanted to try it...) there was an incredible steel drum player with an expansive and fun repertoire of music... Service on both occasions was OUTSTANDING.  For the party of 18, our waitress was impressive, pleasantly and unflappably tending to our large rowdy group.  For we three tonite (ma, grams, & i), our waitress was cheery and personable and the manager personally cleared and set a table for us, an awesome showing of hospitality and concern for me grammy's comfort. The food... Plantain chips appetizer... - the chips could have done with some seasoning, cucumber dipping sauce and avocado salsa(?) not withstanding, the chips taste simply of oil.  Blah. Cornmeal dumplings appetizer... - okay.  Like rustic beignettes deep fried to a crispy outer shell with doughy inside.  Sweetened with a sugary/cinnamony(?) glaze. Codfish Fritters appetizer... - fantastic!!  Tablespoon sized dollops of a codfish batter, fritter'd, served with a dill cream atop a cucumber slice.  The still-batter texture inside seems... unfinished.  Sneakily spicy... Grand Cayman... mango chicken w/red beans & rice, and vegetables. - somewhat dull.  Simply chicken white-meat(?) that was topped with two slices of mango.  No infusion of flavor, no kick. Reggae Platter... jerk chicken w/red beans & rice, and vegetables. - marginal.  Whatever potency the jerk seasoning/dry-rub has is muted.  Again, no infusion of flavor, no kick. Boston Bay BBQ Sandwich... rice/beans, salad. - decent.  Slices of jerk chicken and tangy slaw on whole wheat. Raggamuffin... oxtail stewed with butterbeans...rice/beans, veggies. - deceptively bland.  Despite the dark, glistened gravy, the very tender oxtail tastes like... oxtail. Four entrees, three appetizers, two visits.  Items that wow'ed me?  One, the spicy codfish fritters. Would I go back?  Eh, sure, but not for the food.  The waitresses are cute and Palo Alto is RAMPANT with pretty people who chat, drink, & flirt with 5'5", stocky, middle-class'rs.  It must be a charity thing... I'LL TAKE IT! Oh, and be careful with that Matouk's Pepper Sauce!  That scotch bonnet sauce can hurt you and haunt you! ____________________________________________ Patwa/Patois translation: "If you're not a picky eater, check out Mango, but something [the food] is a little off, understand?"
I came here with a friend who had heard about this place from some co-workers, and it isn't that far from where they work, so it was an ideal place to meet up for lunch.  The staff was extremely friendly here and gave us some helpful recommendations on what we ordered. Appetizers:  Fried Plantain chips with a pepper chutney and cucumber-honey sauce.  It was OK, probably order something else next time. Jerk Chicken Sandwich - It was the lunch special of the day, pretty good price and the chicken carried a good level of heat and was perfectly cooked, moist, tender, flavorful.... YUM! Rasta Plate - It was a jerked chicken severed with some pan fried vegetables, rice and beans.  The chicken was like the sandwich just mentioned, perfectly cooked and seasoned.  I have a hard time cooking chicken perfectly without having to take it on and off and cutting it to check, if someone can cook it well without doing that it makes me happy.... The smoothies here were large and really tasty, if you so desire you can have them add-in a rum of your choice (they have something like eight choices!)  I was thankful that they provided such a large smoothie that would help cure some of the tongue scorching relief from some of the sauces that were brought to the table.  Let's just say, one was hot and the other just an interesting experience of a smoldering log burning slowly burning through my stomach lining.  It made for a few good laughs in between tears.  I thought I could handle spicy foods and heat that's why I drenched a piece of jerked chicken in that molten sauce much to my friends amusement.  The smoothies during lunch we also a daily special, as well I think it was 2-3 bucks, not to bad. If I'm in the area and in mood for some Caribbean food I'd like to give a few more items on the menu a try...
Bringing a date (or anyone for that matter) to 'Mango Caribbean' that cannot handle spicy foods is definitely NOT a good idea. It will cause them extreme discomfort, to sweat profusely, and make excruciatingly awkward faces as they take each bite. They will constantly use their dinner cloth napkin to wipe down their face as they gulp down cups and cups of water. (Not attractive.) I can handle spicy foods, but their dishes numbed my mouth. I REALLY wanted to like this place due to its great, attentive service, cute island aesthetic, and yummy tropical rum drinks (Jamaican Trouble). Maybe we just chose the wrong dishes? (Jamaican Jerk Shrimp & Runaway Bay) If you decide to go here, maybe ask which dishes aren't so spicy? Either that or wear strong deodorant.
The owner (Winston) is awesome-- he's super friendly and he has a huge Palo Alto / Stanford fan base. On to the food reviews: Appetizer- Plantains (3.5/5):  Crispy, sweet and delicious!  The plantains are served with two sauces: a cucumber honey sauce and a guacamole sauce.  YUM.  The plantains are a little salty, so just shake some off if you want less sodium. Mango Salad (3/5):  The best part was the mango and the little nuts (pine nuts)?  It was very refreshing and light. I'm not sure if this is a Caribbean-salad, but I feel like salads at Plutos or Sprouts would hit the spot better.  This is a good, satisfying and healthy appetizer if shared.  (Not really for a single meal.) Ox Tail (4.5 / 5):  Very, very tasty!  You'll get two ox tail bones and a cut of ox tail meat in a soupy bowl of ox tail broth (along with red bean rice and veggies).  It's one of the tastiest meats and the meat just falls off the bone.  My friends agreed that the ox tail must be slow cooked. Mango Chicken (3 / 5):  My friend ordered the mango chicken.  It was ok-- I feel like the mango sauce gives the chicken flavor, but other than that, it's not that special. Chicken Curry (3.5 / 5):  Good sauce.  The chicken is soft and has a little bit of fat, which can be easily removed when you get it.  It comes with white rice, but I like ordering it with the bean rice-- it's more hearty and adds some good texture. Smoothies: Delicious!  They have great smoothies here.  The Doctor's Cave is really good-- not very sweet but very refreshing.  My favorite so far is the Johns Hall- sweet, light and refreshing.  It doesn't taste like an icee and it tastes like a tropical smoothie.
I was always curious about this place so I decided to give it a shot with some co workers. We ordered several appetizers which were the plantain chips and guac as one and the other was the caribbean jerk chicken. Nothing spectacular about the chips and guac. In fact, I prefer the Chevy's chips and salsa. The plaintains were not dense, light, but lacked flavor. It was like eating clean paper towels. Yummy! As for the caribbean jerk chicken, it had moments of being moist, but it too, lacked any memorable flavor. I was disappointed since this chicken SHOULD be excellent at this restaurant. Wouldn't you think?! For the main entree, we ordered the curried shrimp in coconut sauce. The shrimp tasty too "fishy" for me (which meant not very fresh and poor marinades) and once again, lacked any strong flavor. This is not what I expected at all from a Caribbean restaurant. The mango magarita was good. That was its only saving grace to be honest. Where is the quality? Their seafood dishes were $17. Too pricey for lunch. Glad I fulfilled my curiousity. But I am not going to return. $25 per person including one drink is a splurge for lunch. What can I say? I am a cheap bastard and hello, we are in a recession.
My original plan was to go to Back-A-Yard in Menlo Park.  Silly me forgot to look up their open hours.  So I ended up going to Palo Alto for some other caribbean food alternatives.  I would SO go to Coconuts, but Coconuts wasn't open until 2pm on a Sunday.  As you can see, very poor planning.  So next option was Mango!!!!!!  Why not, let's give it a try. I ordered the 1. Reggae Platter- jerk chicken, vegetables, red bean rice.  Too much ginger was added onto to the jerk mix.  I tasted the spiciness and flavor but I much rather them add less ginger and more flavor and spunk into the jerk flavor.  Not as authentic as I have had it in the past.  The jerk mix at Coconuts is what I just described as authentic.  Other wise the red bean rice accompanied well with the chicken. Plenty was given. 2. A side of plantains- a bit too sweet for plantains I think.  It felt like I was eating fried bananas at a thai or vietnamese restaurant.  The slices were split into 6 think pieces, which I thought was a bit too little. I ended up ordering 2 orders since it tasted like dessert to me honestly. Coke tasted diluted and not well mixed as a fountain drink. Boo I enjoyed their outdoor seating and jamaican music going on!  Service was a tad slow but what do you expect with one waiter and probably one cook in the back.  At least he was friendly and respectful. I definitely prefer Coconuts over Mango any day as of now with my experience with caribbean food.
Avoid. I just got takeout from here and it was bad.  Most importantly - the food was bland.  I got the "Jamerican" wrap which is basically a grilled veggie wrap. The vegetables - consisting of mostly onions and then a few red and green peppers - were oily and not seasoned well.  The wrap part was fine but unremarkable. And as far as fixins go - that was it.  There was some mango sauce that was too sweet and nasty to put on, some creamy salad dressing, chopped watery avocado and oil and vinegar. THAT WAS IT. No beans, no rice. And yes, that is available as a side. And I asked for that as a matter of fact. But did I get it? No. I got a wilted boring "salad". The portion was pitiful and would have been rather funny had I not been hungry for a lunch.  I finished it in about 5 minutes and was left feeling completely ripped off. $8 for the tasteless equivalent of an appetizer? Bland, tiny portions, overpriced and got my order wrong.  Why bother?
So come date night on Friday I was wondering if there were any tasty Carribean restaurants and came upon Mango Cafe in Palo Alto and another place in Menlo Park.  The Menlo Park seemed to have better food but I wanted a place I could have wait service, listen to music and walking distance to other places.  So I chose Mango Cafe. I made reservations based on a few reviews but arriving at 7pm on a Friday I certaintly didn't need them.  Walking in I noticed it was a smaller place, the tables way too close together and a little less lively that I had hoped.  But the host was pleasant and seated us near the back quite quickly and was certaintly friendly.  In our big, high backed wicker chairs we scanned the menu and drinks. We ordered the beef turnover for an appetizer.  The Reggae Platter for the entree and a pitcher of red sangria since I had remembered people liking it from reviews. Our waitress was nice, attentive, friendly and even made a few little jokes here and there.  She was honestly sweet and did a great job.  Everything else besides the service was below par especially for the price. The beef turnover was quite plain - about $7.00.  And even when I added the hot sauce it was really lacking.  But the hot sauce was ridiculous!  Way too spicy to even use a little.  Even my husband the king of spicy had to brush some off.  So the the app. was too bland but I couldn't even use the hot sauce to make it better.  Eh, two little bland beef turnovers with a half a prickle of green onions on top. . . The entree was cutely presented and when we got to the chicken it just fell apart - a bit too boiled.  The taste was quite boring for it being jerk chicken!  Not spicy and again I couldn't use that damn hot sauce because it was waaaayyyy tooo hot!  The vegetables were either raw or sightly steamed (carrots, broccoli, cabbage) - I like it that way - but I imagine not too many people would.  Overall we were quite disappointed. The sangria was pretty good I'll have to say and had a fair amount of alcohol and pineapple . . . . but a pitcher was $30.00!!!!!!!!  Crazy! The decorations were cheezy, even to the really cheap red stripe beer flags around . . . . I just couldn't get into it.  Plus there was a cook in the back being really antsy waiting for orders which was super distracting.  I just couldn't get the feel for it.  They did have a cute little nook that looked kind of cool - away from the noise and cheesiness - wish we had been seated back there. The food was really bland, the place just didn't have a great feel to it, the drink too expensive and overpriced for the quality of food.  Oh well, we still managed a good night regardless of this very disappointing restaurant.
My girlfriend and i went here for the first time last weekend after hearing it was good from several people.  We walked in and all the tables for 2 were taken, so we took a seat at the bar and ordered a caipirinha. I spent the summer after i graduated from high school doing volunteer work in a rural section of northern brazil. Hanging out on the beach at Ponta Negra sucking down caipirinhas is about as good as it gets. The bar tender informed us that they are replacing the mojito (another one of my favorites) as the "in" drink right now. I wouldn't really know, nor do i care, i just think they taste good. The bartender was nice and talkative, but not to the point of being annoying, a nice balance. Once our table was ready we sat down with a menu and decided to split the Boston Bay Style Sandwich (BBQ Jerk Chicken with caramelized onions and veggies) and the Mi Good (curried goat with white rice and grilled veggies). We also got a side oder of plantains. The sandwich came big mac style with 3 pieces of bread. I think it would have been a little bit better without the middle slice, but my girlfriend thinks that it held the sandwich together and gave it some structure, i guess thats a good point. Anyway, the sandwich was great. The goat was also great. It came in a bowl with curry sauce like it was stew. I quickly emptied the bowl of goat and sauce onto the bed of rice as this is the way this dish was supposed to be eaten. I appreciated that the goat maintained that distinctive goat flavor and wasn't overpowered by the sauce, it shows some guts by the chef. The meat was tender and spicy, just the way i like it. There were some bones, but they were pretty big and easy to catch, i never chomped down on one. The grilled veggies were also great. They do have ox tail on the menu (a staple of Caribbean food), and next time i might just have to get it. Its one of those dishes that must be done correctly or its terrible, so i very rarely get it at a restaurant on my first visit, i have to see how they do other things first. I can confidently say that i was happy with they way they did the goat and will likely get the ox tail next time i go, unless im not feeling adventurous. You can't talk about this place without mentioning Back a Yard grill on the other side of 101. I thought back a yard does about the same on the meat preparation, although their jerk is a little bit spicier. The plantains at Mango were good, but the ones at Back a Yard are incredible. However, Back a Yard feels like a hole in the wall place where the focus in on the food. Mango has put a lot of energy into the food but has also thought about the whole experience. Even though this place is just a block removed from University Avenue, the whole feel is worlds away. Where as University is a circus of over priced food, rug shops, tourists, and insecure, image obsessed Palo Alto residents with more money than sense, Mango is a closed, dimly lit, intimate, mellow, and welcoming place full of like minded souls just trying to get away from whatever is going on at the Cheesecake Factory a few blocks away.
Reggae Platter.  Jerk Chicken over red beans and rice. Plantains 24oz Red Stripe Negril Beach Jesus Christ......
Droooooooooooooooooooooooooool........ Mouth Watering. I almost made a man-made lake with my saliva. I went here last night with my amiga and it was fabulous. Jammmin' Music is great and  this place has a sweet ambiance  that makes it  excellent to take anyone; Your friends, your mom, my mom, Chuck Norris, a date, your second to third cousin's brother. Anyone, i tell you. I ordered the Reggae chicken platter. Boy, I wanted to throw on my Bob wig and spread the love. Delicious. Rice taste like it had a hint of coconut and the Jerk chicken was so juicy and tender. I also tried an appetizer, Mobay:Spicy shrimp and Plaintains. The waitress said it was spicy for some, but i personally though it needed more! Yes, my cambodian toungue can take fireeeeee. bring it on. So she did. She brought us this Matouk sauce from west india which had papaya extract. Best runny nose and burning lips i've ever had. After this I experience i contemplated whether to start singing 'Three little birds' on the bar.  But once i began to let out the simple line "Don't worry about a thing, Oh no! Every little thing is gonna be all right", my friend got worried and tackled me to the ground to save her from the embarassment . Wah wah wah.
This place is NOT good for Carribean food, so be warned. Our group got the jerk chicken sandwich, the oxtail, and the curried goat. Of the three only the jerk chicken was okay, but doesn't really taste like authentic jerk chicken. The oxtail was awful, very bland and just didn't taste flavorful. The curried goat was even worse...again bland, and the goat didn't taste like goat. Also my friends each paid close to 15 dollars for their food, and the portions were very small for the amount of money that they paid...DO NOT GO here for authentic Caribean food, you will be sorely disappointed. Try Back A Yard if you want authentic jerk food and decent sized portions
This place is so bad it actually brought me out of Yelp retirement. It is terrible, probably the worst restaurant I've ever been to.  The waiters are nice, but holy smokes, I've never had such a tasteless meal in my life.  I ordered the jerk chicken platter, and the chicken tasted boiled, and it was flavorless.  I thought jerk chicken was supposed to be spicy.  Instead I needed to put salt, pepper and hot sauce on it just so that I could eat it. It was absolutely terrible.
Decent food at a decent price.  Not bad, but nothing all that spectacular.  We got 2 different wrap dishes, which come with everything separate on a plate so that you can make your own wrap, with a side of rice & beans.  The rice & beans are mixed in together.  Pretty mild flavor, nothing to complain about. The chicken is very soft and falls apart easily when you stick your fork in it.  The guacamole is different from the typical guacamole served at Mexican restaurants -- It's not as thick... more watery, but it still tastes good when you add it to your wrap. * Mango chicken wrap: Tasty, sweet mango sauce. * Jerk chicken wrap: Spicy, tasty sauce. Main gripes: * The chicken is served cold.  I think it'd taste better if it were warm. * The wrap flatbread tastes good, BUT it's strangely tough.  When I tried to take a bite out of my wraps, I had to gnaw at it and wiggle the wrap back and forth before it would rip off.  Biting the wrap between my teeth and twisting it to try and rip off a piece... made me feel kind of like a dog!
I had a super easy time getting food for our office weekly dinner and meeting yesterday.  Greg Nasser was super cool about planning a menu for us and even delivered the items for free! My favorites were: the jerk chicken, peas and rice, plaintains (mmm!), chicken patties, and the rasta pea cook off (with red beans, black eyed peas, & chayote in a spicy tomato sauce). The chicken patties reminded me of a Chinese pastry that has curry beef inside.  Yum yum.
My friends took me here back in September for my birthday dinner.  Since we had a large group, we were seated in a sectioned off area in the restaurant.   Surprisingly, the service was not very good.  We felt completely neglected. Everyone ordered different dishes and none of us were very impressed.  Some of my friends had ordered the smoothies and one of them even complained that hers smelled like feet.  Hmm...not so tasty.  I had the jerk chicken dinner.  The chicken was moist, but the flavor wasn't mindblowing.  The food was served on mismatched and chipped plates.  I guess that was supposed to give the restaurant a "casual" or "homey" feel, but it just didn't do it for me. My friends and I still had a great time with each other, but I wouldn't return to this restaurant.  I really wanted to like it, but instead I left feeling disappointed and craving a juicy In N Out cheeseburger. :)
Who knew? I'm not a huge fan of Caribbean food. =P But if I WERE...well I don't think I have much to compare with. This is the second Caribbean place I've eaten at and they were quite similar. I ordered the coconut chicken dish that everyone else recommended and be warned that it may be a bit...much. Its a big plate of a LOT of the same thing, which could be good or bad. I enjoyed the first 15 bites and then I was ready for something else. I'd suggest you and your party order a few different plates and family-style it.
Delicious, cheap, somewhat healthy, really f-ing spicy (if you request), Jamaicany and casual.  There's also plentiful parking, good service, never a wait, yadda, yadda, yadda. This place is as solid as it gets.
Wow, the food here was horrible.  Every dish was underseasoned and lackluster.  The tobago special looked and tasted like bad cafeteria food.  The Jerk chicken was tasteless.  The patties were undercooked!! The crust was still soft and doughy.  Even the hot sauce, although spicy which I liked, lacked salt.  I was shocked at how bad the food was...what's going on back there in the kitchen?  Too bad I did takeout, otherwise i would have asked for my money back.  I don't often give such bad reviews, but this place is atrocious. If you want good Carribean food, go to Back A Yard in Menlo Park.
They're going for a neat atmosphere and decor here  - but Mango Caribbean is one of those places that you have wonder how they stay in business. The place has an out of the way easy to forget location.  (restaurants a block OFF university need to be really memorable), and it's always fairly empty inside I like the food here - but share some of the concerns also raised by others: #1 Service can be really really slow - particularly at lunch.  Only 2 other tables were seated - and it took over an hour for lunch.  This is a deal-breaker for me... I can't wait that long for a jerk chicken soup and sandwich. Note: Thinking it was a fluke, I came for lunch again a few weeks later - but alas, same waitress, same hour wait for a simple lunch... #2 - The place does have a "sticky" / "stale beer" feeling to it.  The floor, table covering, menu.... event the wall behind me all felt sticky.    If you come, try to get an outside table to avoid this Some service changes and a fresh coat of paint, and this could be a much better place.
Not bad place to eat.  But it's kinda dark inside, and a little pricey. Went on a date (it was the day before her birthday and wanted to spend time together..) We got a pitcher of the Sangria with red wine (dude... the drinks aren't strong at all...) They shouldn't even be called alcohol.. Also got the Welcome Hall as an appetizer, and for entrees, she got Jamdown, and I got Soca Special. Quite good food... except I was so embarassed b/c I ate so much that when I got to her house, I had liquid poopoo and pooped out my whole meal (but I felt better after a couple hits to the toilet).... That sucked.. I mean... in your date's toilet... thus, no late night play... anyway, this place is supposed to be a Caribbean restaurant, yet everyone dresses up like they're in Hawaii. And there's hella palm trees everywhere.  Too much decoration, and the path straight down in the restaurant is really narrow (because of the palm trees).  Anyway.  Good food, but not a great place to hang out or anything at all. Wasn't really a good date place, but whatever, I liked the food...
A Tale of Two (Jerked) Chickens... Last year I had my first taste of this place and their jerked chicken. I thought it was great... large portions, great service and a fantastic smoothie selection (as previously mentioned the smoothie glasses were the size of a 3rd grader's head). I always ordered the jerked chicken, which came with two hind pieces and salad. There were a couple of different varieties of hot sauces that I tried and some of them were great. I got used to the food, the atmosphere (which was usually ALWAYS 'Bob Marley & the Wailers'), and the service -- the owner was a really nice Korean woman. One evening (about 3-5 months ago) I got a craving for the jerked chicken so my boyfriend and I ventured down to Mango Cafe. When I walked in I felt like I had been hit over the head -- I totally didn't recognize the place. It turns out that the owners sold it to a couple of guys who are REALLY familiar with Jamaican cuisine and the culture (the chef is from Jamaica). At first I thought that I had run into the wrong restaurant but the new owners assured me that it was the place that serves jerked chicken. I believe the new name for this place is 'Mango Caribbean Cafe' and the new owners are transforming it into a bar/restaurant. The menu changed significantly too... but most importantly, the jerked chicken is different!! The seasonings are more intense, more salty, the flavors really pop, and cut of chicken that you get is different-- now they serve it on chicken breasts.  The rice is different too and the smoothies are different (which is a total bummer because for the same price they give you a smaller smoothie). Oh yeah, and the music changed too-- gone are the days of Bob Marley exclusivity, but they also play calypso music too. Do I like the change? Not really. I miss the old chicken, seasonings, and the smoothies. I know that it wasn't really "authentic" Jamaican cuisine but I really liked it. I preferred the flavor of the old chicken. I'm giving this place 4 stars because: (1) despite the change the food is still good (2) service is good (3) the owners are cool.
Jerk chicken is OK Smoothies are a spectacle to be seen. Rotis are the secret here... and somehow I always order one more than I should... oh well.  cry me a river, extra roti, you're getting packed and you're tomorrow's lunch.  "Good night, Westley. Good work. Sleep well. I'll most likely kill you in the morning."
My husband and I decided to try this place for take-out tonight after I had heard good things. My experience ordering on the phone should have clued me in that we were not in for anything good. A teenage boy answered rudely, mumbled through our conversation and even yelled at someone to "shut up" so he could hear me better. When we arrived to pick up our food the only patrons were two guys drinking Red Stripes and watching soccer at the bar...note, they were not eating. Half of our order came out promptly...the rest over ten minutes later. An awkward ten minutes, nonetheless, being that the place was empty and the only employee who afforded us any attention (a young girl) seemed to want to strangle all of her co-workers. Now for the worst part...the food. I will admit, our first few tastes of our jerk wraps were promising, but they seemed to get worse with every bite. The corn cakes we ordered on the side were inedible and the fish cakes were too spicy to take more than a few bites. Only saving grace were the plantain chips, which, honestly, would be hard to screw up. Both of us felt instantly sick after our meals and I would not recommend that anyone try this place.
I used to come here a few times because I loved the jerk joints, but since it changed ownership, I haven't had a chance to check it out until lunch time today. We got to the place and I noticed more people eating outside than in, which I found weird since it was a cool day and we had a break in the rain. I went inside and was blinded for a few seconds before my eyes became accustomed to the darkly-lit interior. There were about 3 other tables occupied, otherwise, everyone who wanted to see each other and the food they were eating decided on chowing down outside. The interior has changed a bit from when it was Mango Cafe. It's more festive and there's bar seating in front of the room, to the left of the entrance. The tables and deep wicker seats are the same. I wanted a jerk dish so I ordered the jerk chicken which came with some veggies and rice. I found the rice to be tasty (although it smelled better than it tasted) and noted that the chicken, although soft and moist, seemed to taste better when the dark black sauce was on it. The portions are a sizable amount of chicken and rice and could easily feed me twice, but I was starving and was able to eat about 75%. I also tried their ginger beer which is very, very gingery (the waiter was kind enough to specify its taste with us) so if you really enjoy the taste of ginger, then get this. Service was friendly and prompt. Parking wasn't too bad especially on a weekday during peak lunch time. We only had to walk less than half a block back to the car.
Mango is a fun place, and it has cleaned up its act a bit in certain areas since last I ate here. This place is always fun to come to, if for no other reason than dancehall reggae playing inside and the imported West Indian hot sauce that I cannot find anywhere else. Food was spot on today. The girl and I order wraps, hers of jerked chicken, mine of shrimp. There wasn't a lot of shrimp, but what there was became more than enough considering the heaping roti bread portions, rice, beans and a side salad. Interestingly, the wrap comes unassembled, so be ready to get your hands dirty. Also, if you're like me, you eschew the rum-based drinks and just go for the $7 large frosted glass of Red Stripe. Given the spicy-hot nature of most Caribbean food, you can't go wrong. The guy overcharged me for the wrap, but was quick to make amends when I pointed it out to him. Given how much I had enjoyed the meal up to that point, I still laid a fat tip on him in the hopes that it keeps this place running a little while longer.
I like to come to this place with friends, eat jerked chicken and drink big, frosted glasses of Red... Read more 
UPDATE 7/5/08 I now also love the breezy wrap dish--it's a garlic pepper shrimp wrap. delicious! ************************************************************************ black river salmon entree: jerk outside, superb inside--like butter. plantains hit the spot. and with the mojito it was the ultimate balance between, sweet, salty, and spicy. the lighting was just right--red-eyed, the music a solid mixture of roots and dancehall. oh, and let me not forget the heddy heddy bread pudding with carmalized rum and rum raisin ice-cream, yo! i relish in the after-glow
Service was great, food came out quickly, smoothies were delicious and jerk joints fell off the bone and were amazingly spicy and tasty! Yum!  The menu is very different from when I used to be a regular when it was Mango Cafe (the side salads seem to be totally gone, and forget about those yummy palm hearts), but we all found plenty to eat. I had the Chicken Pelau, which was creamy and a very large portion. I have lunch for today, too ;) We were there for a Wednesday lunch and it wasn't crowded at all.
When you are in Palo Alto you'll notice the things most people do about dead suburbs: everything closes early, the "urban" storefront areas are limited, you can't walk to much, and there are more familiies and retired people than people who have yet to make families.  (Unless you count the hopeless techie masses and Stanford students that accidentally left campus.)   Most businesses in such towns alleviate the agony (and respond to the appropriately low demand) by charging you pennies for things that cost far more in cities.   Except Palo Alto, where after paying your rent and buying a beer your wallet feels like it's been to Manhattan. Until Now. Go on Thursday night to Mango Cafe and get a $2 Red Stripe and equally cheap snack food in a reasonably interesting cozy atmosphere.  It's truly the only place priced like it should be in Palo Alto. And there's one more thing.  They have excellent cheapo meat pies on Thurs nights and the chicken tabago (or something that sounds like that) is awesome.  It's got chicken, peppers, and onions in a creamy curry sauce with just a bit of spice.  Yum.  Good call, Liz!
Okay... I really don't understand what the fuss is all about! The website and the menu looked great... but the food was mediocre. The only good thing about this place was that I went with great company (the lovely gastro-"gnome" Linda T) and the saving grace of the dessert. I ordered the jerk chicken which came out with little pieces of bone in there that I kept biting into... and the fact that it tasted reheated or something. The chicken was in small pieces but mushy... totally overcooked. I drenched my food in the Jamaican hot sauce to try to add some kick to it. The service was pleasant but the food was mediocre.... The rice was ok, not a fan of the beans but the fried plantains were GOOD! Linda ended up with the chicken coconut dish. Both dishes didn't really impress... the portions were huge and filling. It has great ambiance but the food was mediocre..... Bathroom was decently clean! I hated those darned wicker chairs! They kept snagging my shirt and the two chairs were way too wide for the table!
All I can do is shake my head in shame, my friends.  Shame.  Caribbean food is about flavor, not about spice - and ofttimes people get confused about exactly what to expect from Caribbean food.  This restaurant is exactly the reason why people get confused. First, let me say that this is not a Caribbean restaurant, this is a Jamaican restaurant.  I know it's a fine distinction, but it's one worth noting.  What's the difference, you ask?  Go to Jamaica and find out for yourself.  Jamaica is only one part of the Caribbean.  It's like saying Guatemalan food us representative of all Latin American food - it's only one part of Latin America. Second,  you need to understand that you're talking to a guy who had a chili-eating contest with his best friend in high school... just to see how long we could last.  So this is not a complaint about the level of spice.  However, I will complain about how the spice is used.  I don't like pepper just for the sake of pepper.  If you put too much pepper in something, it drowns out the other (hopefully) succulent flavors present in the food.  And Mango, for the normal palette, puts a little too much jerk seasoning and/or pepper in their food. The one saving grace about Mango is the staff.  As soon as we entered the owner came over and did everything but sit with us for dinner.  He was extremely friendly and cordial and for him alone, I would consider going back to this place. And with that, I continue my eternal quest for a great Caribbean restaurant in the Bay Area.
I have been going to Mango Cafe for years. However since the original Jamaican owners sold it and a Korean owner took over I frequented less often. The atmosphere was colder and the place was most of the time desserted (even so the food was still good). It just became to depressing to go there and see the miserable owners who did not have a clue how to run a Carribean restaurant. Well finally after they sold it a couple of months ago I went back and I will now come more often again. The new owners renovated the place, got a liquor license and even have a small bar. The food has improved too. My favorite is still the Chicken Roti and as a starter the Jerk Chicken. If you are into spicy food make sure you ask for the bottle of hot mango salsa.
It's Beer, Hooray Beer -- oh wait, I didn't make that up, I stole that from a Red Stripe commercial... In any case, Mango is definitely some good food. The service the night I went was super-good too. The waitress knew what she was talking about, and was also super-cool (hey -- I secretly have a crush on you) despite her only working there for a few weeks. As far as the food goes, the Jerk chicken was super-moist and delicious,  I had some as part of my appetizer. I ordered some weird coconut-milke based rice dish that was also fantastic. And the hot sauce that's served on the table, is plenty hot -- even for the heat-seekers out there. Also, the portions of food are so marvelously huge, you'll be glad to take some home for next day's lunch. I can with no qualms recommend this place... the only reason I didn't give Mango the fifth star was because it just wasn't perfect... I certainly give it the higher end of the four scale though! ps - word of caution, don't order the grapefruit soda, it's just not good.
I had a tasty BBQ jerk chicken sandwich with a nice lingering burn. A glass or three of their decent red sangria chilled that out. This street was much quieter than anything on University Ave. AND had soccer on the tv!
Went there early (6pm) on a Sunday - not busy at all. Expect to pay around $20 for a meal with a single drink. Had the Tobago (jerked chicken) which was fantastic. My friend had the Trinidad Special and requested it to be "spicy" - he says it was the spiciest thing he had ever eaten. I think there was yellow curry in both of our plates, so expect that sort of flavor along with various jerked meats and steamed veges. This place is small, but nice. Good place for a date and very friendly service.
Quite possibly my favorite restaurant in the Peninsula/So Bay, Mango is wonderful. It does kind a feel like you've stepped into the Caribbean with the staff's laidback friendliness and the reggae mix. But the true reason for going is the food. I've never had a bad meal at mango. The plantains are to die for; then again they are deep-fried. The sandwiches are hearty without being greasy- this is one of the few places that I recommend getting the whole wheat which balances out the flavors nicely.  Their entries are heavenly as well; my wife is currently into the curry, although the Tobago special is always a favorite (if you like coconut crme).  They even offer ox tail and goat, not my favorite all the time, but it is delicious when I'm feeling gamey. Oh yeah, they have the big red stripe, the extra-large stubby is just kind a funny looking, and wonderful smoothies (with and without alcohol).
If we could give half stars, then I would give Mango 3.5 stars (grade: B). I have little experience eating Caribbean food so I have little to compare Mango to. The restaurant was nice looking inside. I ordered a popular dish - Reggae  Chicken platter. The boneless, skinless chicken was tender and mildly spicy. It came with red bean rice and a few mixed vegetables.  I would go back again to try other dishes too.
After a little red mango, we headed over to Mango Caribbean Cafe to continue the mango theme. I had never had Caribbean food before so I was pretty stoked. We split two dishes, I forgot what the names of the dishes were, but one was a jerk chicken soaked in coconut milk mixed with rice and beans and the other was a almond crusted salmon. The chicken soaked in coconut milk was SOOOO good. I wanted to horde the plate and not share any at all. I was wolfing down that food like I no longer had to chew. There was a slight heat to it, that was perfectly masked by the cool milk. The salmon was good as well. But it didn't really stand out for me vs other places. I guess what made this dish really Caribbean was the mixed rice and beans that it came with. Their sauteed veges were also delicious. They also had a wide array of frosty beverages, but alas we were already cooled down by froyo we didn't feel the need. Note: On a hot day the back of this restaurant is an oven. We asked if we could move to the patio when a table opened up and thank goodness we did. After that it was a lovely cool evening. I'm glad someone suggested this restaurant as I would have probably never found it.
The two things Mango has over Back-A-Yard are: 1. location: it is located on Hamilton Ave. in Palo Alto, meaning it is off busy University but close enough that one could have dinner here and go visit a different restaurant for a night cap. 2. Pickapeppa sauce: Mango is the only place I know of that has it on its table. Pickapeppa's original with its Scotch Bonnet pepper is the bomb and makes the dishes here so much better. Other than that, Back-A-Yard is just hands down a better restaurant.
I've never had Caribbean food before, so I could be completely off my rocker, but I thought the jerk chicken was quite delicious!  I ordered the Rasta Pasta which is vegetables + jerk chicken + bowtie pastas.  It came with the parmesan cheese on the side, which I appreciated.   I'm not usually a fan of spicy foods, but the spice of this dish was just right.  There were a few jalapeno slices tossed in among the green beans, onions, carrots, and red bell peppers, but they were easily moved aside.  Oddly, the dish also came topped with two slices of tomato.  The jerk chicken was amazing!  It was obviously marinated, fork tender, and perfectly spiced! Service was a bit lackadaisical, but I enjoyed the outdoor seating area since the weather is becoming warmer.  I would definitely return to try some of their tropical smoothies and other dishes.  Prices were a bit higher for the decor, but portion size was pretty good.
Mango now has a full bar, with some nice cocktails.  Well drinks are $3 on Saturdays from 5-7, which is nice. Thursday nights here are great.  Red Stripe bottles are $2, as are meat patties, which are sort of like large empanadas with ground beef inside.  Both are an excellent deal and are good. I've had the normal menu many times and have never been disappointed, but it is merely a good value instead of an insanely good value.  The kitchen is also open until 11 most nights, which is good in terms of Palo Alto hours... This is my neighborhood place, as it's cheap, the staff are friendly, the food is good, and Thursdays are really good.
I may have ordered the wrong thing, but this place ain't so special. A caribbean joint should be at least able to do some decent jerk chicken and my friend's was dry and pretty plain tasting with not much flavor.  I ordered ox tail expecting something good, but even that was pretty much mush. I've had better caribbean food from food carts at half the price.
Definitely not the Mango I remember. The dining room is much improved. I remember when the place used to be always packed and the tables crowded close together. The tropical decor was a bit much but it does make you feel a little like you're on vacation somewhere tropical, just somewhere very touristy. I still remember when it was BYOB if you wanted to put rum in your smoothie so the full bar is a nice addition. I do miss the giant fishbowl glasses the smoothies came in though. They now come in a tall glass decorated with the little fake umbrellas of course. My special lady friend (SLF) and I decided to order two entrees that we would share. The Grand Caymen Special which is the mango chicken served with red beans and rice and sauteed vegetables was one of our choices. We also ordered the Black River which is the breaded salmon sided with a fruit salsa & white rice. I guess I should've checked the Yelp reviews more closely as it seems these two dishes weren't well received and our experience with them was also sub par. The chicken was very dry and dark. It reminded me of a pork shoulder. There really wasn't any mango flavor either but there were a few slices of fresh mango that came with the dish. Maybe it's just the style of how they prepare the dish but we didn't much care for it. The salmon was also dry which made it taste not very fresh. Again, maybe it's the style but not how I like my salmon cooked. Luckily, my SLF who normally doesn't care for spicy food but is always willing to try something new, ordered the jerk chicken soup to start us off as she figured it would be a good way to try jerk chicken without setting her mouth on fire. It was very much like a chicken noodle soup except with jerk chicken. They also had no problem splitting the order for us and it was more than enough for each of us. To me, it wasn't super spicy but it did have a little heat to it. So after the success with the jerk chicken soup and the disappointment with our entrees, I ordered the jerk joints and my old favorites, the beef and chicken patties. The jerk joints were very juicy and the meat fell off the bone. For some weird reason I did miss the old style a little when they were more like buffalo wings, heh. Both patties were great and very tasty. It's like a pastry with a curry sauce in it. The service was good and our server was very friendly and happy to make recommendations. I'd probably go back as the jerk joints and patties saved the day and now I know what not to order next time.
I met my friend Jessica for drinks here for her birthday as Nola was under construction at the time.  Seeing that people have sort of criticized the food, I stuck with the alcohol orders only.  They were running a $4 special on the super-sized Red Stripe bottled beer.  First time drinking Jamaican beer and it was pretty good!    The decor is a bit cheesy inside with bright neon lights mixed with dimmed lighting and bamboo/straw highlights throughout the room.  The server we had was nice and accommodated us nicely.  Even we spread the bill into four or five credit cards, she managed to split it up with a smile. In summary, for drinks within a very relaxed atmosphere, Mango Caribbean can definitely satisfy that criteria well.  Any other expectationsbeyond that, you're on your own.
I don't know very many places to get Jamaican food but the jerk ed chicken kicks ass. The meat literally falls off the bone. The restaurant is simple and not much eye candy. Rico's rating: cool factor: *** quality of food: **** selection of hot sauces: **** how hot : *****
This is my first time to this restaurant.  One of my business partners raved about this restaurant and invited me for lunch. The food was great and reasonably priced. I had the St. Lucia sandwich, which is chicken sandwich with mango and avocado.  It was delectable. The location was perfect and it has the Jamaican feel to the restaurant.  Very unique and tastefully decorated.  Very clean as well. Since this is my first time here, I will give a 4 Star, until I tried pretty much everything on the menu, then I will move it to 5 Star.  I will go back to this restaurant with my family and friends.... We talked to Winston, the owner.  He manages and sometimes cook the food.  A great guy from Montego Bay.  Awesome job Winston.
Went to this place with my hubby expecting a lot out of this place. I ordered Curry Goat and one traditional Chicken dish which was more like a burrito.  To my dismal the food was aweful! First of all the quantity for the price is terrible.  Secondly all my curry goat had was BONES..where was the meat??????. And it was supposed to be SPICY abut it was bland and  horrible.  ALso the burrito like dish they served was terrible.  I will never recommend this place to anyone.......  this crapy place.... One star is for the nice service...
1 star for the decor that brings me back to the island. No star at all for the quality of food. I used to love the food here... This restaurant used to be very good and...I'm suspecting the original owner is not with the restaurant any more... The food is flavorless but only spicy hot. The curry was watery. The shrimp was frozen and then overcooked. This is a place for happy hour hang out only.
What a terrible place to experience Caribbean food. Ugh! Mango Caribbean is a cute, festive restaurant with a casual island-ish vibe. Too bad this doesn't quite carry over to the tastefulness of the food. For an appetizer, we ordered the Welcome Hall, which was a plate of friend plantains served with guacamole and an honey cucumber dipping sauce. The guacamole was a nice accompaniment, but the honey cucumber sauce was funky and I tasted no honey. Overall though, this dish was the best of what I had. We also tried the Greneda Greens salad with jerk chicken. This was an okay dish, but I mean, how can you possibly screw up a salad? The jerk chicken was spicy, but not as great as I've had in other restaurants. My main dish was the Mango Walk (mango wrap), which came recommended from some of the other Yelp reviews. To my surprise, I received two plates of all the items that go into a wrap...and I had to put it together myself! What the heck!? One plate consisted of strips of roti (how the hell are you supposed to make a wrap from STRIPS of roti!?) and a mound of rice and red beans (which was super BLAND). The other plate consisted of the mango chicken (which was VERY overwhelmingly sweet), mango salsa, a chopped cucumber salad, and a guacamole dipping sauce. It wasn't a very pleasan experience putting these ingredients together only to see them fall out of the other end of my wrap stript. When I order a wrap I expect it to be put together for me...not to do all the work myself. This dish would've been more aptly entitled the "Deconstructed Mango Walk." Service here was very lackadaisical. We asked for 2 more minutes to place our drink orders, and the waitress disappeared for nearly 20 minutes before we could flag her down again. The staff didn't come back to check up on us nor our food, and we had to ask for the check when we had been sitting idle for quite some time. Not attentive at all! Perhaps that's the style in the Caribbean...but hey, in America we still expect top notch customer service! Oh, and if you're coming for Happy Hour, the website is completely misleading! It indicates Weekdays from 6-8pm, but when you get there, you find out that it in fact means ONLY Thursdays and Saturdays!? What!? Can you get any more confusing?? I definitely don't recommend this place.
The atmosphere of this restaurant is both upbeat and relaxing at the same time. The braised oxtails slow you down by being a definite comfort food. You can tell the 'tails have been braising for hours by the way the meat just slips off the bone. The 'tails are so tender you want to savor every bite, which you should since you only get 2 medium sized pieces of oxtail in their serving. The dancehall music (Sean Paul) in the background and the extra kick in the scotch bonnet hot sauce speed you up while enjoying the slow cooked jerk chicken. An interesting contrast. A desert not to miss is the bread pudding with coconut ice cream which while decadent doesn't slow you down and just soothes the warmth from the jerk. A solid B that gets bumped to a B+ because of the atmosphere and the three pitchers of sangria that our table shared.
I just can seem to eat anywhere else when I head to Palo Alto. I have been here 6 or more times and take clients every chance I get. The customer service (Greg) is great and the food is authentic jerk. In the mood for something spicy get the Mo Bay appetizer (spicy shrimp), but not for the faint of heart. They just changed the drink menu and the place has the recipe for an infectious good time. It's worth the drive from the city, and definately worth it if you are in town. Don't miss out!
Always a pleasure to dine here! Winston the owner is always friendly and happy to see us. I LOVE the soups. They've mended my  "sick" numerous times. The jerk chicken sandwitch is devine and i just love the jerk chicken quesadilla. I always have the same smoothie "doctors cave". I love Guanana banana juice, LOVE IT.
This place is fun to go to, to spice and switch things up. My friend's parents use to own this restaurant, and he would invite us and give us a good discount. The jerk chicken is great, and their smoothies are delicious! It's like on the 'back' side of downtown PA, a little hard to find. but those kinda places are sure gems!
This is my first time eating Jamaican food and I have to say this place is pretty tasty. The jerk chicken was really spicy! But it had a lot of flavor and was tender and juicy. The ox tail was also tender, tasty, and good. The plates came with rice and beans, and boiled veggies. I don't normally like boiled vegetables but it had some flavor here. The rice and beans weren't that great. Kind of dry and bland. (I've had THE best rice and beans in Costa Rica. I have yet to find a place to match that or come close to that in the bay area. If you are ever in NYC, the rice and beans at Pio Pio - Peruvian food, are really good). The side of plaintains is about $4, but they only give you about 4 - 5 paper thin slices covered in honey. I personally don't like too much honey on my plaintains but they were still okay. They need to give bigger portions for this. La Bodeguita Del Medio (Cuban place in Palo Alto) is very generous with their side of plaintains for $3.50, and they are DEELICIOUS. Smoothies are not milk/yogurt/ice cream based. They are made only with fresh fruit and are very good! But the glasses aren't huge, just tall.  I was picturing Jamba Juice. The bread pudding was a bit dry on the outside and too mushy on the inside. Full of raisins. I didn't really like it. (Nola's has great bread pudding. So does Montrio's in Monterey, CA). The rum/raisin ice cream was pretty good though. Overall, a decent place to eat. The decor and music was fun. I will go again. =)
I love the waitress who answers the phone. She's always careful to mention something is animal-free when I inquire about the ingredients of  menu items. The vegan options I've tried so far are Rasta Pasta, Red Peas Soup, and Rasta Pea Cook Off. The Rasta Pasta left a lot to be desired because it was so bland and has little/no sauce. However, Red Peas Soup is the shit! It's hearty, with lots of carrots and potatoes. The Pasta Pea Cook Off is pretty awesome too. I also love the green salad that comes with the meal. The vegetables are crispy and fresh. The olive oil/vinegar dressing is basic yet delicious. Oh, the plantains are good also although not as good as  the slightly caramelized plantains at  Vital Ital Calabash in Berkely but the portion is totally worth $3. Update: I'm SUPER STOKED because I just checked their website and saw that their new menu indicates vegan items or items that can be made vegan!!! WOOHOO!
WHAT THE HELL HAPPENED?!  the owners changed again i hear.  now they really suck.  The jerked chicken is now WHITE MEAT?!?!   That alone made it suck.  And it was all shredded up and wet, like it was just baked on a big pan with juices in it, as opposed to the nice dryish outside of the old chicken legs.  And the spices just aren't as good as before.  sigh.  I have to take this restaurant off of my south of the border list now. original review, 6/26/06: ------------------------------- JERKED CHICKEN!  You get  two whole legs.... oh my god, it is SO good here.  SUPER SPICY, perfectly marinated, well prepared.  Fast service, at a decent price.  The jerked chicken wings are great too.  And you can get all these nice smoothies while you're it, with some exotic tropical fruits.  My absolute favorite place to get lunch in Palo Alto on my own bill. I have not had any jamaican food to compare in the bay--don't even think about the jerked chicken at Chachacha (IT SUCKS, it just tastes like sorts spicy chicken that's not even marinated).  Only better I've had was in LA in some hole in the wall I can't remember the name of. My only complaint, is somehow, the food doesn't sit well in my normally iron-clad stomach.  And I need to go to the bathroom BAD within an hour or two... I think it's something with the spices, because the chicken is always cooked so well it falls off the bone. But the food tastes so good, I'd still do it again and again.  yup.
Hmm this place has been under new ownership so many times my head is spinning. It's been a while and it seems recently they've changed again. The service was agonizing, but the jerked chicken, curried goat, and crazy huge fruit drinks still kept me coming back. Also I pride myself in being able to eat pretty spice but Scotch Bonnet peppers still kick my ass. I used to like one particualr waiter here since he seemed to be the only person on top of things. Then one day he was gone. I figured with such good waiting skills he graduated onto something better. Without him I've pretty much stopped going here. I do miss the food and ponder every now and then about returning. Sounds like the recent change and improvements is going to warrant a trip. Always loved the ambiance and vibe, just hope the wait staff have it together.
The Mango Cafe is fun, casual and great for groups.  My department at work had our holiday party there this year.  The staff was very accomodating and helped us work out a menu that fit just right with our budget. The result was a nice buffet for 30 people! If the atmosphere doesn't put you in an island mood, the sangria should do the trick!  The Jerk Chicken was also awesome! Be sure to visit: http://mangocaribbean.co...
I've been there twice with my g/f on a saturday night and i've been very impressed by the overall dining experience The food is simply delicious. I haven't tried a lot on the menu, but the basic jerk chicken was very good. I like my food with a little kick to it, which this place has for sure. I did order some fried shrimp appetizers and they were yummy as well. The staff was very nice and attentive. Wine glass portions were reasonable. The overall vibe is relaxed but professional. I get seated fairly quickly everytime I go there. Their jerk chicken is so damn good though!
We went there last night for dinner. I had the mango chicken and a dark & stormy.  The chicken was incredibly tender, it came with rice and beans and sauteed veggies.  All the food was done as it should have been.  Very tasty. It was chilly out, and they had all of the doors opened so I was a little cold through the meal.
This is for a review awhile back... Small and cosy little place I was expecting more favors or spices in the caribbean food... nothing too memorable... but I remember their drink was good...
I absolutely love this place. The food, the decor, and the great hospitality by the owner/manager. For today's venture, I tried the Jamaican appetizer with Chicken. Pretty much a soft empanada, but soooooooo much better. It has a spicy kick to it that is to die for. The only sad part of this dish is that it is served with two and they can be deathly addicting. For the entrees, I ordered the jerk chicken sandwich and my friend ordered the chicken curry. Both dishes were spot on. The chicken is different than most Thai or India restaurants in that the sauce is more soupy and not as flavorful. But, the chicken of course was delicious and perfectly cooked. My sandwich was pretty tasty. The only downside was the chicken was cold. Not sure if that was how it was supposed to be or not. It was served with a nice little mixed green salad. We also tried dessert. After having that spicy appetizer, we needed something to cool out mouths off. We ordered the Banana Tree. Oh sweet heavens it was delicious. Softly grilled bananas covered in a sweet sauce with a scoop of mango ice cream (i think) on the side. Superb!
I think I like the idea of this place more than the actual place. The mixed drinks are fun and delicious. The Jamaican rum punch is a great deal (on some nights, I guess). However, the regular smoothies are too watery and flavorless. I think they use too much ice or something. I prefer the ones I make at home. Flavor-wise, the food at this place operates in two extremes: completely bland and burn-your-mouth spicy, with little in between. For example, the red beans and rice dish is terrible. The rice is overcooked and there is no flavor at. all. We requested hot sauce, and they brought ridiculously spicy habanero, which, sure, some people like, but how about something spicy but not lethal--along the lines of tapatio or cholula or something. The chicken soup is also one of the bland dishes--basically like drinking hot water with mush in it. The BBQ jerk chicken sandwich is almost good--the chicken was pretty spicy and tasty, but then they put it on cold, raw bread, which got all soggy and just was not good. The salad it came with had way too much pepper. The side order of plantains is good. The best dishes are the build-your-own wraps. The wraps themselves are tasty, and all the components to go in it (e.g. guacamole, mango) are good too. Service is slow... sometimes very slow. The ambience is fun, except when there are flies getting in my drink. :(
Me and the Canadian wanted a snack so we stopped here after seeing that they had the goat roti (which he has been craving) on the menu posted on the window. The server was a sweet girl and very friendly. We ordered the Trinidad special Goat Roti (bone in) to split, with red beans and rice and a grilled veggies side. It was very good and well seasoned. The bones were difficult to pluck out but  the meat was fall-off-the-bone, you just had to be careful not to bite into one of the many bone bits. The red beans and rice were good, a bit bland, but was easily fixed when mixed with the meat sauce from the roti. The veggies were tasty, a bit overcooked, but had a nice flavor to them. It was a good dish.
It's hard not to feel relaxed and satisfied when dining here. The staff are friendly and the food is fresh and flavorful. I love the wraps and the ginger tea. YUM!
Ya, mon, this Caribbean place is good! Decided to check out this place with the new owners and definitely came out very satisfied. The setting is informal on a more peaceful street parallel to University Ave. You can sit inside or there are a couple of tables outside the front. Ordered one of the specialty banana-mango-coconut drinks for $4.50 - expected a standard smoothie sized glass but it came out in this humongous goblet! it was good and there was no way one person could finish this monster... The jerk chicken plate ($12) came out with a very generous portion of juicy and delicious jerk chicken, tasty coconut nice with red beans, and good garlic vegetables. The jerk chicken was very flavorful and spicy - for those who don't like spice or salty foods, this is not for you. I did read someone else's review about the food being too salty but I think it's just the strong jerk spice flavor. The other dish we had - curry in roti bread ($12) was also really good and the curry came out piping hot in the bread. The service was extremely friendly and I'd definitely go back in a heartbeat.
2 1/2. I really wanted to like this place.  I was hoping that since it was a small place not on the main streets of downtown Palo Alto, that it'd be a little more authentic, but I should've known better.  It's downtown Palo Alto..... I got my hopes up, as I've been searching for one of those hole in the wall island places I went to in Boston. It's easy to miss it as you're driving by, as it's kind of tucked away and doesn't have a huge sign.  It's only 1 block away from all the craziness of University, but at night, it's pretty quiet there.  The decor is very casual, and it feels kind of tropical inside.  There are also some patio tables available. As for appetizers, the wraps are do-it-yourself with roti, which I actually prefer.  They come with a variety of fillings, and you can make different variations of your wrap... this would be good to share amongst the entire table.  The vegetarian one came with a little cup of mixed vegetable curry, some sweet pickled onions, guacamole (lacked flavor and was very runny), stir fried vegetables, and something else..  it's a nice variety, but none of the flavors really stood out.  The soups are burning hot, which is always a plus - lukewarm soup is one of my biggest pet peeves.  The soon come Jamaican soup had a broth nicely thickened by the beans, and it was pretty flavorful. Unfortunately, the food didn't turn out as I expected it to be.  Much of the food was only spicy (like the black pepper shrimp), which overpowered any underlying sweetness of the shrimp itself or from the honey of the marinade.  The size of the individual shrimp was very disappointing for the $17 they charge.  It comes with rice with red beans and some plantains (sliced longitudinally, fried).  The jerk chicken wasn't too special, and it was exactly the same as the appetizer drumstick meat, which is discounted on Thursday and Saturday nights.  The jerk chicken tasted much like soy braised Chinese chicken drumsticks, which is fine, but not what I expected here (even though I know there are Asian influences in the Caribbean). There are some other curries, stir fries, and other island dishes on the menu. The red stripe lager is only $4 for a 24 oz on Thursdays and Saturdays.  It's a nice light beer that even non-drinkers can enjoy.. I never realized it was Jamaican.  They also have a list of some more tropical cocktails and some wines, all of which are $7 per glass, $30 per bottle, which is very reasonable for the area. Service was super nice, though.  The server was very helpful when we had questions about the differences between dishes, and they were super accommodating about moving us to a less drafty table. While University and Ramona were packed with people, there were maybe 2 tables here tonight.  It was pretty empty for a Saturday night at 8pm.  Like I said, I really wanted to like this place, but there's too much other good food in the bay area that I'd rather go to.
I like this place a lot. Especially the plantain chips with cucumber honey dipping sauce and citrus guacamole "welcome hall" appetizer. I could see coming back here for some drinks and appies. I liked the vibe. For dinner, I got a shrimp quesadilla made with roti. It could have been a bit more melty. It tasted like it wasn't made with very quality cheese. Plus the shrimp wasn't cut up at all which made it really lumpy.
Love this place. Especially love the atmosphere, which can always make a mediocre dinner (which this is NOT) into something special. Good spicy food, might be a little slow to come out but you know they are preparing things fresh back in the kitchen. Big-boy botts of Red Stripe at a great price.  Also a host of other good tropical drinks at decent prices and some non-alcoholic smoothies. I remember the oxtail being only so-so but they still have some vegetarian options that are pretty great and the bread is fantastic.
I just had the best lunchtime experience at this cafe yesterday.  For some reason I thought it would be Thai/Pan Asian, since it was called Mango, and roti was on the menu, but I guess that the Caribbean also has that stuff.  Learn something new every day, huh? Anyways I had the jerk chicken, tomato, avocado quesadilla - and it was tasty!  Chock full of chicken lumps.  My only complaints were that you had to eat it with knife & fork because it was so messy, and there wasn't really enough tomato and avocado. But you know what made my meal?  The service.  Our waitress was the sweetest, friendliest, and most attentive waitress I've had in ages.  My friend wanted a *really* spicy roti thing, and she warned him over and over how spicy spicy was.  But she didn't dilute it for him back in the kitchen - he ended up with a perfectly spicy dish.  We chatted for ages about good Thai restaurants all over the Bay Area, and I'll be going to check out one of her recommendations later on.  Talk about going the extra mile - she texted one of her friends to find out location of the restaurant!  Unbelievable.  I'll be going back just to hang out with her more!
I was here with a large group of friends. I had the Tobago Special, which was a rice and chicken dish in coconut milk. It was delish! Others in my groups enjoyed their various chicken, fish, and seafood dishes as well. Watch out for the spicy pepper sauce - it's hot! The service is great, and the atmosphere is comfortable. This is definitely worth a second visit.
I freakin' LOVE this place! Unfortunately my boyfriend lives in Palo Alto so he's already over it but seriously, this is my FAVORITE place on Thursdays and Saturdays! I don't know what the hell is in these chicken/beef pattys but for two bucks each I simply cannot eat enough! And those rum punches? Haha...like zero to black out in 30 seconds...LOVE IT! But when I'm not tryin to get hammed, I'm very happy with the two buck Red Stripes. I've also had the vegetarian and jerk wraps, both of which I devoured! Its small, its tropical, its my favorite.
Sometimes I want a coconut curry that isn't Thai, and Caribbean does quite well.  The decor is very nice here, and you get quite a lot of food for your buck.  And the desserts are delicious.  The papaya hot sauce is quite hot (even though it looks more like a sweet and sour sauce coming out of the bottle). Service left a little to be desired.  Once, my two friend and I got moved around from one table to another, and the host offered us free dessert for our troubles.  Unfortunately, when we got the bill, only one of the three desserts were deducted, and since don't think we would have gotten dessert had he not offered (since we were so full), the whole exchange left me mildly annoyed.
Pretty good food for the price.  Hubby had the jerk chicken (and I had the $4 jerk joint the next day...)  They were spicy but not hot enough to burn your tougue off.  PERFECT!!!  :)  I had some non alcoholic drinks which for $4, it's a HUGE deal!  They also have mixed drinks too for slight higher price too.  If you like brothy veggie soup, go for the Pumpkin Soup.  :) However, the "Jamaican" (both beef and chicken turnover) stole the show.  And on Tuesday and Thursday during Happy Hours is when they have those at $2 a plate.
ok, so i know the owner a bit (he's jamaican), but hey, i wouldn't yelp it if it wasn't good.  It's good! I'm no jamaican foodie, either, but i loved everything and the ambiance was super fun, playful, with good music and a cute little bar.  The soup was great and the wraps (i got a shrimp one) come deconstructed with a whole bunch of tasty items (mango chutney was especially good) so you can build them into the little squares of tortilla-like wrap bread (roti) however you like.  The plantains were great too, i love plaintains, and the green dipping sauce goes perfect.  The prices are good and it's a great casual fun place.
Is a small restaurant in size but big in heart!   In my second time here, we were seated at the only available table, next to the kitchen.  The gentleman in charge insisted he buy us desert because of this.  Hardly necessary, but my son was eager to take up that offer :) I strongly suggest the plantation chips.  It comes with two excellent dips.  The Soup is delicious.  And Although there is not a kids menu offered.  My 5 yr old was throughly pleased with the Wrap that comes 'unwrapped' so that he can make his own "mini burritos" as he called it. Ordering a black & tan will get you a beer mug the size of an child's head, And the mango mojitos and pina coladas are both well prepared.
Very disappointing after having had reasonable meals there about 3 years ago.  The shrimp dish was tasteless and the rice was completely mushy.  The vegetables were fair.  Don't think I'll be going back.
This place deserves three stars, I gave it 2 in order to balance the other reviewers. The food is okay. The prices need to be lowered at least 30%. The mixed drinks arent strong enough. The music is too loud. The service is very nice. Plenty of parking. If I was walking around university and someone wanted an interesting dinner Id go back but otherwise Ill eat elsewhere.
First, it was IMPOSSIBLE! TOTALLY IMPOSSIBLE to hear anyone at my table w/o shouting thanks to the extremely live room (no acoustic dampening anywhere) and the kettle drums and music - and bonus Holy Shit Batman - the volume of the music in the gents room would have you deaf in minutes - you won't be hanging out in there for long! The food - decent, tasty even... only there was some ingredient that left my mouth irritated for days - I don't know what it was, but it wasn't fun and I've never had that happen anywhere else - and I practically spend my first 5 or 6 years in Jamaica and have been back many times since. Summary - food ('cept for that mouth thing) decent/good - ambience (TOO LOUD MUSIC) sucks. Pass.
Charming company and a nice atmosphere- tables outside are a little cramped- or you can call them cozy... Tried the two drink specials - the cantalope fizz (interesting- bubbly, but a little mint heavy with champagne) and the blackberry mojito. Didn't know that blackberry was a synonym for very watered down - but will pass on mojitos in the future there. Tried the Chicken trinidad- pretty good, not what I was expecting, but prefered my dinner partner's tobago (chicken) - although it looked like something the cafeteria ladies of school lunchrooms would call mystery meat, it was very tasty!!! Skipped dessert - had fried plantains with the meal instead that weren't what I was expecting- would have expected the dessert version and I would have liked that more. Definitely would go back for desserts- the bread pudding looked really realllllllllly yummy. It was small, and pretty quiet- so a nice atmosphere for winding down the work week and easing into a summer weekend.
OVERALL RATING: Service: 3 Decor: 3 Food: 3 Dog-friendly Yes (they offer outdoor seating) -------------------------------------------------- Plus (+): Comfy outdoor seating Minus (-): A touch on the expensive side for what you get -------------------------------------------------- Went here because I had a coupon and was looking for something different. I LOVED the Jerk Chicken Special (comes with rice, coconut milk, and veggies). The outdoor seating area is comfy and inviting. Staff seemed nice enough. No refills on sodas, though...bummer. -------------------------------------------------- Thanks for reading:)
I've been there 3 times, and ordered the same thing every time.  The Tobago Special. Chicken, rice, vegetables, coconut milk, and a nice blend of spices ... mmmm. The giant Red Stripes are nice, too.
Ok...I should not have gone here shortly after finding Back A Yard :( My portion of plantains was pretty small and for some reason I kept  expecting to find a beetle in my beans and rice.  The food was pretty darn bland too :( The festivals were not at all what I expected and they were very chewy, dry and dense....Hah, actually they were shaped like human turds....mmmm appetizing huh? My husband's meal looked kinda gnarly too....He ordered the "Tobago" which ended up looking like a mountain of coleslaw.  Upon closer inspection it looked like a mixture of beans and rice topped with chicken and veggies covered in a coconut sauce.......not at all yummy looking. This place is really not very good and it left me feeling very unsatisfied :(
Oh...the tragedy of calling this place a 'Carribean' restaurant . Went here with another couple and they've been there twice in the past and said that the food was good but this time around, they said it was shameful. The only saving grace for this place that deserved a star was the attentive waitress and the beef patties and even so, the beef patties might have been frozen and heated up in a microwave.  As we were seated eating our appetizers, we all overheard a patron ordering some type of rum from Barbados with something else mixed in. The bartender responded and said, 'Sorry, we only serve rum from the Carribean'. We all looked at each other and must have said..hugh?! Isn't the Barbados part of the Carribean? Anyways...here is what we all ordered: - beef patties - jerk joints - chicken drumettes - mobay - Spicy pepper shrimp with fried plantain - reggae platter - Jerk chicken, guacamole, lettuce, tomato, sour cream, cilantro and cheese - mi good - goat curry - Tobago Special - Chicken pelau chicken cooked with red beans & rice in a base of coconut milk The jerk chicken tasted more like ginger chicken with no spices whatsoever. Now...if you even had jerk chicken, your scalp should be itching and burning because of the spicyness but we were nowhere close to that. If this so-called 'Carribean' restaurant can't get jerk chicken right, then they shouldn't be in business at all. To wrap up all the other dishes we've had, the only flavorful dishes were the goat curry and the tobago special. Both dishes were plentiful but the rest of the dishes were all very disappointing. For the amount of money we paid for dinner, it was such a let down and we will not be returning.
Came by again for lunch with a friend, and boy have they redemmed themselves. Let's just hope they keep it up for the next time I stop by. All in All, food was nice and hot! Veggies were fresh & crisp! Appetizers are always good!!! I suggest the Plantain! Yummy! I Love Caribbean Food!
Very cute charming Jamaican restaurant. They have recreated a little beach shack in the restaurant. I heard the coconut milk shakes are awesome. We had some coconut chicken with rice and vegetables. They were delicious! Also the water (maybe owner) got us some awesome spicy sauce that was really spicy! Delicious food in a very rustic, a typical Palo Alto place!
Loved it! The Tobago Special was delicious and the Jerk Chicken was incredibly spicy. Came on a Thursday and Red Stripes are only $2.00. The waitress was very nice and service was very fast. Going back on another Thursday for sure.
WHAAAAAT!? this used to be my FAVORITE restaurant in Palo Alto. The soups were rich and delicious and the jerk chicken was spiced to perfection. When my group of friends asked me to meet them there for drinks and dinner I was so excited to eat at my fav joint. But I knew something was wrong when I got a dark n' stormy and it tasted like watered down lime juice and urine. WTF. But when the food came that's when the real shit hit the fan. I ordered a pumpkin soup that was advertised as having "chunks of pumpkin, potatoes and dumplings". What I received was a tasteless bowl of broth with one dumpling that looked like a severed finger and skinny slices of carrot. NO PUMPKIN. NO POTATOES. TERRIBLE. My friend ordered a sandwich with sourdough bread and got a sandwich that was, I am not exaggerating, on Wonder Bread. This place used to be amazing. I don't know what happened but IT IS A WASTE OF YOUR MONEY AND TIME!!!
Eaten here twice with co-workers.  Food prices are reasonable for what you get (especially for pricey downtown Palo Alto).  Thursdays have a ton of deals.  I believe it was $2 for a red stripe (Jamaican beer).  Reminded me of Corona - I'm not a big beer guy, but it wasn't bad.  I liked their smoothies too.  The owner is a really nice guy.  He oozes friendly Jamaican.
I love this place. Great Service/Great food, can't go wrong. The jerked joints are the best I've ever tasted. The meat falls off the bones. A close second has to be the Oxtail, delicious!!! Only bad thing, no discount for frequent customers:(
I wasn't thoroughly impressed with this restaurant. I mean, they had good food and ok sangria, but other aspects just didn't do it for me. Hard to find location. I couldn't find the place for a good 20 minutes. Service staff wasn't too friendly. Our clothes smelled terrible after dinner :( Don't think I'll be returning.
This place used to be great. It's gone through several owners in the years that I've been coming here. Now, it's gone back to the original owner, but the prices have increased a bit and portion size has decreased. The jerk chicken used to just fall off the bones, but it was hard and it seemed charred. And as another reviewer has stated, the chicken wasn't as flavorful as it used to be. I used to love the beef and chicken patties here as well, but even those have gone downhill. It just came out soggy. The owner was waiting tables when I was there and he did seem like a friendly person, but that alone will not make me come back. I'll just have to look for another Carribean restaurant...
Had a tasty mango mojito and a jerk chicken salad. It was delicious! I don't know what got into me, as I am usually an unashamed spice wimp; but yesterday I not only ordered jerk chicken at a Caribbean Restaurant, I ate the pepper! The server/bartender/cook took pity on me and set me up with some mangos and a cup of ice. I will definitely be back for more delicious food & especially the drinks!
Great food, if you like spicy. I first visited Mango Cafe in 1998, the food was great, big smoothie glasses etc. Around 2002, the ownership changed again. The food went down in quality. Now the owner who is Jamaican has returned the restaurant back to authentic food. Although I miss my collard greens (thanks to the African American owner in 1998) and other dishes, they have brought chicken and beef patty's and other hard to find beverage's like Ting and Ginger beer. I would definitely give it a try, if you like spicy food. If not, it may not be the place for food.  The owner who is a big soccer fan, installed a large flat screen to watch the World Cup. The place is decorated more on par with downtown Palo Alto. I hear they have a decent Happy Hour.
The ambience is really nice; very Caribbean. Went for lunch on a weekday; hardly anyone else there, pretty quiet with some soft reggae playing. Appetizer: Plaintain chips with sauce.  Very bland.  Several vegetarian options on the menu. The Trinidad special was O.K.- just  too much turmeric:  Roti-like (but thicker) bread stuffed with vegetables.  Rice on the side. Quick service; will not go there in the near future, but  will recommend Mango Caribbean Restaurant and Bar to friends who haven't had  this cuisine before.
Solid 3 stars. I like the decor and the music (it's fun, don't take it too seriously, and yeah it makes you really want to go to the Caribbean) and that large groups can be accommodated. I had a good drink there -- I asked the waitress what the least sweet cocktail was and she recommended the Dark & Stormy and it's awesome!! It's ginger beer and rum, and the ginger beer is very gingery -- no Canada Dry watery sugary crap, actual ginger beer. Food was ok, I got the pepper shrimp with plantains. The plantains were awesome, shrimp was ok. The rice that came with the appetizer was good, but the rice that came with the entree was pretty gross. I'd definitely go here again -- it's a fun place to take people who are visiting the area, and a fun place for a group event.
Colorful, cheerful and clean. Love the music, the owner and their house sauce...yum..yum..mmmm! It's not the bottled sauce! Ask for their house sauce - made with Scotch Bonnet peppers. Not much choice for a vegetarian, but what they have on the menu is great! I love their chayote, red beans plate. The drinks are good - best Caipirinha ....it is amazing!
So.. tis the season for ongoing Holiday parties and crappy food. Not the case last night. Granted the party was hosted by a successful physician and her husband who is equally successful in business. So their breathtaking house in the Los Alto's hills set the ambiance but the catered food (yes catered) sealed the deal.. Being a Foody, I had low expectations for catered food. All I can say was that I was wrong and it was amazing!! Everything from the red beans and rice cooked in coconut milk to the jerk chicken, jerk salmon and roti bread! Granted I don't have much experience with this cuisine but my tastbuds were blowin up! I love spicy food and I found myself back at the feeding trough three times. I can't believe I have never been to Mango Carribean before my experience last night?! I will be there soon. Maybe get a little irie to set the mood and my appetite!
The Grenada greens w/ jerk chicken is the BEST SALAD EVER! Totally filling for 1 if you get it on your own. They SERIOUSLY skimped on the guacamole...i think I got about 1 tablespoon with my wraps (like a fajita). They could go a little easier on the grease. The drinks are a bit light on the alcohol. But you know what? I liked it anyway! It'll be that place I go when I want that particular salad. Because it's freaking amazing.
Exotic looking and great decor but that's all to this place for me, went here a few times but it's totally been a hit or a miss, and am forced to conclude that certainly something is missing here. Slow service, dirty tables, you never know what gets on your clothes and accessories from the furniture here. Everything was sticky :( The food was okay, Pepper Shrimp was good, I don't think I would go back cos of the whole sticky experience, food being just very average and bad service.
I didn't really know what to think before coming here because the reviews were so all over the place.  Sadly, I am going to have to side with the negative reviewers.  I originally wanted to try Coconuts but they were closed on New Year's Day, so I came here because I thought Back A Yard was too far.  I don't have much experience with Caribbean food so I'm not sure what it's really supposed to taste like, but I hope it doesn't taste like this.  Had the plantain chips (Welcome Hall) to start and those were ok, not super delicious.  I found it odd that it came with a guacamole dipping sauce, but it was still better than the cucumber honey dipping sauce.  The mango chicken was moist, but so bland.  Did not find it appetizing at all.  The bartender was nice and cheery, but it seemed like the server had a stick up her hoo ha.  She didn't give us an attitude or anything but she was somewhat cold. Never coming back.
I am a Jamaican and this is the worst attempt at Jamaican food EVER. It is not authentic and it does not taste good either. If any individuals have been mislead to think that this is real Jamaican food, I feel their pain and I wish they tried to get food elsewhere to correct that. The owner must be ashamed of himself because there is NO Jamaican who will ever eat at this place and return. I would never suggest to this place to anyone not even an enemy. DO NOT EAT HERE IT IS HORRIBLE!!!!! the sad part is that people want authentic Jamaican food and some idiot believes they should make the food bland. The whole point of having a Jamaican restaurant is to duplicate the original recipes as they would be made in Jamaica. Not some bland saltless crap.... this place should be shut down
I found Mango Caribbean Restaurant and Bar on yelp and decided to check it out with one of my buddies.  Its a pretty decent sized place with a small bar that promotes the beer Red Stripe (I guess the official beer of Jamaica).  The waiter (who I think may have been the owner) was really friendly and told us to take all the time in the world.  Me and my buddy ordered the plantain chips for an appetizer and we both got the Grilled Shrimp Pond for our entree.  The plantain chips were good, pretty much fried plantains that came with a cucumber sauce and mango-like salsa.  The cucumber sauce literally tasted like smashed cucumber (so if you like cucumbers than you'll like it) and the mango-like salsa was more creamy than salsa-y. The Grilled Shrimp Pond was a curry that was pretty good.  It came with about 6-8 medium sized shrimp, carrots, green beans, and onions.  It reminded me of a thai curry without as much flavor.  It was served with a small portion of rice.  Overall, it was pretty good; I ate it all up so no complains there.
The atmosphere is nice here, you feel like you're on the island. Other than that, the food is so-so. I've had trinidadian roti and Mango's roti is very different, not as flavorful. I also had their oxtails, which could be a lot less gelatinous. Overall, not a great experience to really taste caribbean food. Try Backayard in Menlo Park for the real deal!
This is my personal favorite restaurant in down town Palo Alto. Mango cafe is in a convenient location, even if it's not on University, and it is more affordable for the less popular location. The service is the best I've run across in a long time, and the waiters always seem eager to be helpful. Of course the food was wonderful as well. Mango Cafe does use a lot of pepper, but I love that. The only dish I have been disappointed with on their menu was the goat, which I found disgusting. But I get the feeling that all goat tastes disgusting, so it's no fault of their kitchen, I guess. Give it a try, you won't be disappointed.
Was craving some good Caribbean food so browsed yelp and found this place.  Too bad I did not read the reviews, I saw 3.5 stars and thought, hey this sounds pretty good.  A lesson to be learned read the reviews!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  The workers and ambience was great.  We ordered the Burn the shit out of your mouth shrimp that came with rice and plantains.  If you can't even eat a mild salsa then you deffinately better stay away from the Mobay Spicy pepper shrimp with fried plantain (six pieces) $8.5.  My sphincter will feel it in the morning. For dinner we had the Jerk Chicken with rice/beans and veggies.  The dish was ok but lacked flavor, way to bland for my taste.  My mate ordered the Jerk Chicken Quesidilas which again were bland bland bland. I may come to this place again but this time I will make sure that I get something that has much more flavor and minus the fire in the hole shrimp.
This restaurant has changed hands 2-3 times in the past 2 years, so while the name is the same, the restaurant is not. The service used to be complacent at best, but the food and low prices were its saving graces. Now the opposite is the case. The service is very good, but the food is barely edible. Dishes are ill prepared with little or no knowledge of Jamaican cooking. Meats are bland, as if added to the sauces just before serving, with little or no marination. The service was sincere and good, so if they work out the kitchen problems, it will be a winner, but don't go there to eat, only perhaps to drink.
I still remember Mango Cafe (old name) where Jamaican food tasted so great.  Jerk Chicken used to be full of flavor and spicy.  Goat Roti , Delicious!  The meat used to be tender and aromatic, the curried vegetables green-tinged with spice. Fine, fine hot sauce. Really delicious. Now, under new management and with new name food here was horrible.  We ordered Jerked Chicken and Goat Roit.  Both the dishes were under seasoned and lackluster.    The Jerk chicken was tasteless and  taste was quite boring for it being jerk chicken!  The Goat Roti looked and tasted very bad.  I had an awful experience.
Yo mon! This place is the real deal. Very laid back place, great service, and excellent food. The owner(?)  is really nice and can will often stop by your table to welcome you, recommend dishes etc. The menu is extensive and really great. I love spicy  and there are quite a few truly spicy dishes, even vegetarian ones, and many other traditional Rasta  and Jamaican dishes that are not spicy at all! My favorite is the Rasta Pea  - reminds of my vacation in Jamaica every time. I hear that the jerk dishes, goat curry and the chicken curry are all great as well. They also have an extensive drinks menu.and of course they serve Red Stripe as well. The decor inside is a little dark, but the food is great and when you're washing it down with Red Stripe  - who cares?
Mango has changed ownership again at least once, maybe twice, since my previous review... and for some reason I can't quite put my finger on (slight variation in spices? slightly smaller portions? jerked chicken too spicy now for the kids?), I no longer find myself regularly excited for their food. It's still nice for a change from time to time and I still like their islands-style vibe, but it's more of a 1-2x per year stop now than the 1-2x per month standby that it once was. Ah well, change is inevitable for all of us I suppose.
My favorite hole-in-the-wall on the Peninsula.  Good food, mellow atmosphere and cheap.  Rotis and... Read more 
Lunch review: jerk sandwich was okay - needed more flavor and spice, but that's often the issue with Caribbean restaurants. Pumpkin soup was inedible with a smell that hinted more of rotting pumpkin.
the second you walk in here, its a completely different atmosphere; i felt like i was off to the caribbean! The island decor, jamaican beats, and great outside seating really is a great touch to the place. We had the Mobay to start, which is spicy pepper with sweet plantains over rice and the Reggae Platter (jerked chicken). It was delicious!!! ****They are not afraid to put on the heat on the food here!****  But surprisingly,  the spice does not overpower the taste at all. Ask for their Calypso sauce, a perfect compliment to any dish. But be warned, although this is not even the spiciest sauce here, limit yourself! cos before you know it, your lips and mouth will be burninggggg. I'm looking forward to coming back to try the other entrees, and the drinks! YUMMMMMMMMMMM!
Mango Cafe is under new ownership.  Some of the new changes include a chef from Jamaica, an updated menu, and a cozier ambiance.  There is more of a Caribbean feel to the place with the reggae beats and island decor.  The owner is super friendly and welcoming.  Although there are few vegetarian options, I wasn't disappointed with my dish.  I ordered the vegetarian rice and beans.  It came out piping hot with the peppery aroma of spiced beans and fresh tomatoes.  It was super tasty!  The portions are plentiful and delectable.  I'll come back again for this comfort food dish.
After getting a good taste of similar restaurants around the area, my last stop was to try Mango Caribbean Restaurant & Bar. I went in around 2:30pm and there was only one other table finishing up their meal. The kind gentleman behind the bar directed me to sit at one of their tables in the middle of the room. As I sat down in their large wicker chair, I felt a sense of relaxation. Jamaican inspired music was bumping in the background with ground shaking bass. The restaurant was tastefully decked out in Rasta decor. There were lots of wooden ornaments, masks, spiritual pieces, brushed art, and drawings. The walls weren't left plain as I saw pale green on one side and light peach hues on the other, a double wooden shutter painted blood red hung in the middle of the hallway, and directly opposite was a deep red room containing several tables reminding me of a Witch Doctor's Lair. I also saw a comforting ceiling fan with palm leaf blades similar to those at a Tommy Bahama store, a fish net hanging from the ceiling with plastic sea creatures, and a large turquoise patio umbrella in the front lobby. Overall, I felt like I was on vacation in a restaurant without a worry on my mind. I was able to decide what I wanted beforehand after looking over their website. This is what I ordered: *Mango Walk Wrap $9: The plate consisted of two slices fresh mango, marinated chicken chunks, guacamole, lettuce, tomato, mango salsa, cucumber, and a tangy balsamic dipping sauce. Since you can 'Build Your Own' small wraps, so to speak, with their four pieces of roti bread, you can decide what to put in it. Fortunately, I was skillful enough to divide everything up well. Each condiment, guacamole and mango salsa and dipping sauce, added different textures and flavors to each wrap creating a unique palette experience. My mouth salivated with each juicy bite making me crave it more and more. *Jamaican Me Crazy Smoothie $3: Before I ordered this smoothie, I was imagining a thick fruity smoothie with blended coconut, mango, and banana. Instead, it came out the opposite and tasted exactly like an Orange Julius drink from back in the day; watery, icy, and sweet. Total bill came to $13.11 after tax and they accept credit cards. Overall, my experience was uniquely different. Food selection is abundant, and beverages range from nectars, smoothies, and alcoholic ones. The Rum Punch for another day sounds quite interesting for $4. Food was hot and edible at the time of being served. I took my time eating because I knew if I didn't, I would end up biting my inside mouth because it was really that good! Mango Caribbean is great for lunch and dinner. Bring some friends; it's a great place to chillax and unwind over good conversation.
The best jerked joints around. Warning these can be spicy as !@#$ and I dig the mellow atmosphere and great service. Reggae in the background, authentic food and a nice beverage menu including fresh smoothies.Big up Mango Cafe in P.A.
I joined Yelp just to write this review. This restaurant was disgusting. The food was SO nasty. I ordered the Jerk Chicken. Basically someone took a ladle, scooped out some greasy (mainly dark) chicken and plopped it on to my plate. It had such bland flavor. Also on my plate were the "sauteed" vegetables, aka 1/2 of a white onion sauteed in oil. Thanks. And what about the molded rice + beans patty? Probably the only edible thing on my plate. My boyfriend ordered the tobago entree and it had the consistency of regurgitated cat food. It was grey, came out in a mushy pile, with hey, look, onions! Completely inedible. We complained to the waitress and she just said "Oh I'm so sorry!" and then we forked over 35$. Never EVER coming back here again and I hope this review deters others. Do NOT go here. It makes me think of Gordon Ramsay's Kitchen Nightmares. I don't even want to know what went in our food...
thursdays/saturdays: 2$ meat patties (shreaded and a creamy type meat put in a patty, may sound gross but its soo good. make sure to eat it with the hot sauce.) 4$ jerk joints (chicken wings, the meat falls right off the bone. recommended) 2$ red stripes lunch specials daily. My friend used to own and manage this restaurant before the management changed (around 2006) and i used to eat tons and tons of the jerk joints, which by the way are still delicious even under new management. I'm a big fan of their chicken roti dish (Trinidad special), last night i shared the tobago special (chicken pelau which is a type of coconut chicken with rice, topped with veggies. it was pretty good but the dish would have been better if served with a side) and i also shared a jamerican wrap dish (vegetarian) which comes with a side of chutney, guac, some bean thing, sauce and rice. right after the meal i literally had to put my head down because i had overstuffed myself for the 100th time. the service is good, the owner of the restaurant seems to always recognize me and gives me a warm welcome/goodbye.  there is a side room where the walls are painted a firetruck red where a group of up to 15 people can sit. overall, i like the place, i go there every so often when im in the area.
My quesadilla was lacking... But the atmosphere was really great and so was the jerk chicken. Reggae music always makes me feel good!
When I was an undergrad, Mango Cafe was one of my favorite spots. Over the years it has changed ownership several times and the quality has varied with each owner. I've visited the current incarnation of Mango Cafe 2 or 3 times. Each time I've been a little disappointed as my old favorite dish, the curried goat, has turned oily and and the other dishes I've tried have been a bit bland. But alas I would come back on occasion hoping for a return to it's former glory. My last visit has ended any possibility of me returning until they change owners again. An old friend and I met at Mango Cafe for Saturday lunch. He hadn't been to Mango Cafe under the new ownership and he wanted to give it a go. I haven't seen him for a while and even though I wasn't thrilled with my previous experience under the new management, the food wasn't horrible so I agreed. We ordered the codfish sands as an appetizer.  My friend was excited to try them as he had them a lot growing up and on occasion makes them himself. We both were a little disappointed as they were a bland and a little too oily. For my entree I ordered the "Reggae Platter" which is jerk chicken and beans and rice.  As with the codfish, the dish was edible, but nothing special. I found the chicken a little bland for my tastes.  But for the record there was nothing "wrong" with the dish, I just didn't think it was that tasty. My friend ordered the "Mi Good" which is curry goat over rice. Unfortunately for him, I failed to warn him about my previous experience with the dish. My friend commented that the dish was OK, but not as good as it was. He agreed that it was a bit oily. Things go from OK to bad for him when about halfway through his dish he finds a large (about 2" square) piece of yellow plastic in his food.  We call over the waitress who promptly takes the dish away. She offers him something else, but at this point my friend is pretty disgusted so he refuses. Now the funny thing is that finding plastic in your food is a good enough story for the day.  But amazingly, the owner of Mango Cafe makes the story even better. After the waitress clears my friend's plate, she notices that I've only eaten about half of my food.  She asks how everything was and I tell her that it was OK, but it was much better under the previous ownership.  At this point I'm really not complaining, she asked and I told her my opinion. About 5 minutes later, our waitress comes back with a cell phone in her hand. She says that she has the owner on the phone and he wants to talk to us. I tell her that there is no need for me to talk to him, but she insists the he really wants to talk to us, so I take the phone. My friend and I laughed for about 1/2 hour about what happens next. Now at this point, we're both in a pretty good mood. Even with the problems with finding plastic in his food and my disappointment with my dish, we had had a good time catching up. I figured that we would get comped for his dish and that the owner wanted to talk to me to apologize and get clarification about the plastic in the food. So the owner asks me what was the problem. I tell him about the plastic in my friend's food and that I thought my jerked chicken was bland. I told him that I had been to his restaurant a couple of times and that I thought that it was a little better under previous ownership.    He then starts the dress me down about the jerked chicken. He says that jerk is from Jamaica and is authentic. He asks me if I'm Jamaican, which I respond "no". He says that if I were I would know how good his jerk is. He then proceeds to tell me that if he didn't like a restaurant the first time, he wouldn't come back (he has a valid point there, but as I said above, I have fond memories of Mango Cafe and was hoping that they just had a couple of off nights). This line of conversation goes on pretty much one sided for a couple minutes. I try to interject on occasion that I'm really not sure why he is arguing with me as I: 1. Didn't ask to speak to him. 2. Wasn't really expecting any compensation for my dish. 3. Only rendered my opinion after the waitress asked. After being lectured for several minutes, I finally tell the owner that he has a great point about not returning and he doesn't have to worry about me coming to his restaurant again and I hung up. I give the phone back to the waitress and explain what transpired. She was stunned and very apologetic. In the category of "no good deed goes unpunished", she said that she had called the owner in hopes that he would convince us to come back. I feel bad for her as she was just trying to do a good job, but in the end she probably helped turn a below average dinning experience into a truly memorable bad experience. In the end, the owner did not charge us for the meal with the yellow plastic embedded in it. I still had a great afternoon catching up with my friend and now I have my own "Soup Nazi" story to tell.
It has been a while since I have been at this place. My most recent memories were good so I dragged another friend. Chicken jerky, pepper shrimp and salmon jerky as a main dish. It was horrible. We end up leaving the salmon after one bite. Everything felt as if they were cooked 3 days ago. What a big disappointment and embracement for me after saying all these wonderful things to my friend. We sat outside, and I am not even going to go to describe the non-cleanness(I felt the stick stuff under my shoes) of the floor and the table etc.. Go there with your own risk.
I'm no expert on carribean food.  But I like spicy and they have spicy.  I like drinks and they have BIG drinks.  Jerk chicken is yummy, and everything I ordered I'ved liked.  Except for something weird I ordered one time, but that is because I like to try everything.
I eat a lot of spicy Latin and Asian food and have a pretty high tolerance for heat. Mango totally kicked my ass. I think we got the pepper shrimp appetizer and it was so hot it almost hurt. No amount of plantain eating could recover the ability of my tongue to taste the food that followed. I think it also made me more sensitive to the heat in the rest of the food too. To their credit, I think they warned us about the shrimp but I've never eaten anything that hot. I'd probably try this place again, but skip the magma shrimp.
4 stars for the quality of the food, but 3 stars because of two things. 1) the "extra" (aka side) we ordered said 6 fried plantains.  I wasn't actually expecting 6 whole plantains because that would be a ridiculous amount, but when it came out it was six very narrow strips of plantain, instead of the six chunks of plantain I expected.  I think each strip was less than 1/6th of a plantain, so there wasn't even a whole plantain.  Seriously?  $3 for a fraction of a plantain?  And don't say "fried plantainS" plural if its one plantain or less.  There should not be an "s" at the end of that statement. 2) My boyfriend had the Yehman quesadilla, which said on the menu "jerk chicken, mango chicken, shrimp, or jerk salmon....[plus other ingredients]...8/9/10"  We assumed the chicken ones were 8 dollars, the shrimp 9 and the salmon 10, or at least the jerk chicken was 8, since it was the first thing listed.  I asked about this when she charged us $8.50 for it, and her response was "Oh, actually the chicken was $9, I charged you 50 cents too little."  Huh?  If the chicken was $9, what was $8?  She claimed there was a vegetarian option, but at best the menu was extremely misleading, and it's possible they were trying to rip us off.  Obviously 50 cents or a dollar or whatever isn't a big deal, but it bothers me when restaurants do things like this, and in a case where the menu is clearly confusing or ambiguous the dispute should always be resolved on the side of the customer. Other than that, we enjoyed our experience very much.  Sitting outside on this warm evening was lovely, and the citrus salmon and avocado sandwich I had was quite yummy.  My bf wasn't overwhelmed by his jerk chicken quesadilla, but I really liked it, although it is HOT (much spicer than the jerk chicken I've had at other places in the area, particularly Backayard).   The fried plaintain, though small as noted above, was delicious as well.
Came here after reading a lot of glowing yelp reviews, but it just didn't stack up.  The food was decent but the curries and rotis taste of raw spices , which is pretty easily avoided.  The waitstaff is really nice, and they've got red stripe, so it ain't all bad.  It's a nice change of pace, but I wouldn't come here just for the food
I used to come here to have lunch with my coworkers, they loved the fruit smoothies and the jerk chicken wings.  While I liked the smoothies and the jerk chicken wings, I didn't like anything else.  Tried their rotis, didn't care for them and the regular plain jerked chicken leg.  The chicken tended to be on the salty side and served with rice, but the rice tasted so bland.
Yelp wants me to update this review... not gunna happen because I aint going back.  it was lucky to get 2 stars the first time so I'm leaving it at that.  there, happy yelp?
Been here a couple times and have never been impressed. Things have either been bland (rice and... Read more 
First time eating Jamaican.  I had the Aruba (Jerk chicken joints) and the Soca (chicken curry). Portions were more than adequate for two.  Service was prompt and polite.  Both meals were succulent, chicken falling off the bones.  For 20 bucks it was definitely somewhere i will be returning back to.
This place was recently renovated and reopened. The jerk chicken was pretty good. But without being smothered in the hot sauce the waiter provided it would have only been okay. The rice was well spiced and moist. The service was good.
What happened to this place?!?  I used to come here all the time and refer friends here about 14 years ago.  Just went again as I started working nearby and now my favorite food of jerk chicken taste like it's been simmering in a soup pot, the roti I was constantly picking out the bones on almost every bite and the red beans and rice was mushy. Sadfully the place has lost my referral. Please bring back the good food, I want your restaurant to stay open!!!
Close your eyes and you are almost there... in Jamaica? Tobago? Maybe. Between the steel drums and the "ya mon" uttered by the waiter in his I-am-definitely-from-the-islands voice, the sounds were spot on. The ambiance is excellent - the art, the low-yet-colorful lighting, it makes you wonder if you just woke up under a palm tree on the beach after consuming their intoxicating (non-alcoholic) ginger beer. It's a 3 1/2 star deal here. The food could use just a touch of work. The mango chicken seemed promising - the red beans and rice were flavorful, as were the veggies with it (although the sauteing seemed to involve a whole lot of very shiny (i.e. oily) veggies on the plate), the chicken was tender as anything but really lacked any flavor. There were two slices of mango on top, but no mango flavor in the dish. Disappointing. The portion was huge - and I will enjoy making a wrap out of it for lunch! (and then again for dinner!) The vegetable roti/Trinidad special was described to me as "well, there's vegetables in here, potatoes, and potatoes and ya... a little spicy but not too spicy" I didn't sense too much enthusiasm inside the potato filled tortilla. The fried plantains - could have been a bit crisper but quite tasty with the Caribbean style guac and some green honey sauce. We did enjoy dinner and the ambiance of the place is really great - I would go back and just order something different. Important Note: The menu on their website is outdated. The prices are not correct and there are MANY MANY more options - but it's a good start.
as soon as i walked through the door, i felt like i stepped into this parallel universe... greeted by the owner (?)... welcomed with lively music and seated in the "front row". they are/were having this summer special on appetizers for less than their usual prices... had the jerk joints and the chicken turnovers.... REALLY good. my mouth is watering as i'm thinking about it right now haha... had the st. lucia (tropical mango chicken, avocado, lettuce and tomato).. it was really good! i think like $9... good portion. i'd come back.... it's kinda "rustic" looking... lol... i'm not into "rustic" looking places
Many people will remember this off the beaten path Carribean spot simply as "Mango Cafe", its name for many years before changing ownership. The new owner kept many of the favorites on the menu while adding a few more welcome additions to spice things up. The staff is very friendly and professional - I've had servers remember what I ate on previous visits and offer other dishes I might also like. The food is consistently great - any dish with the jerked chicken or goat is a winner. I recommend the jerk chicken quesadilla or the jerk chicken sandwich for lunch. They are both reasonably priced and come with a salad. Get one of their many freshly made smoothies that are also very affordable. It is well worth the one block walk off of University Ave.
so, my best friend warned me last week "mango is overrated. do not, DO NOT do the mango." so, what did i do? i did the mango. for starters, the chicken patty was microwaved. the salad w/shrimp was way too salty, way too much pepper--i choked on my first bite. i had the chicken palau; no flavor; chicken was burnt, dry, and overcooked. everything was mushed together--looked unappetizing and tasted even worse.  and the "sauteed" vegetables were semi-raw and tossed on top of the rice. my friend and i had stomach aches after we left. overall, one of the worst meals i've ever had and at $50 for two people, way overpriced. there were two redeeming qualities--the smoothies were good and the service was pleasant. but i will never mango again.
Friendly Service,  Great and relatively spicy food -- it does need some more of the habanero sauce to add the right zing. Love the jerk chicken,  their pasta, the roti and their beer.  Smoothies are good and started way way before Jamba and co came along.
I wanted to like this place, but found it extremely underwhelming. The Tobago Special came out rather bland and flavorless. I could taste hints of the coconut milk it was supposedly prepared in, but there wasn't much else going on with the dish. The bartender also did an absolutely terrible job with my mojito. It tasted like lime water with some stale mint thrown in as an afterthought. It also seemed to be lacking cane sugar, or any sweetener for that matter. I'd gladly take a carelessly made Sprite/7-Up bastardization over what's made here.
Mango Cafe is closed and under new ownership. It's called Mango Caribbean and occupies the same location with more spice to the menu.
With all the eateries on University Ave it is easy to forget about Hamilton Street.  However, the parking is easier and this eatery is not your standard old fare.  Nice ethnic change.  The salads are particularly good.  Nice place for lunch with good chance you can find a parking space - what more could you ask for
I remember when this place was called "Mango Cafe" years ago.  We went there with great anticipation since we remembered how great the food was back then.  I have to say we were disappointed.  In the day, Mango Cafe's jerked joints was *sublime* and the place was always packed.  But now, their chicken was chewy and sat in thin oily sauce that was way too spicy.  The rest of the food was so-so.  On the bright side it is very easy to get a table now, I guess. I hope they bring back those original recipes.  Until then, I think I'll pass.
Great little Carribean cafe. The smoothies are the size of my head - I froze to the last bone trying to deal with one. The food is incredible, but a bit too spicy for my tastes, so the two elements were definitely using me as a battle ground. The service is just the way I like it to be: its there when you want or need it there.
Where the real power players go to dine in the 650. Try it all!
Thursday/Saturdays $4 rum punches, $2 red stripes and $2 beef & chicken pattys. Can't beat that! Service is great. Small place with a lot of heart.
Wonderful, wonderful, hugely spicy food.  I haven't been in ages, because I always forget it's there, but I used to absolutely love it.  Also, I know of nowhere else in the area with the same food.
Most delicious jerk chicken and so juicy and tender it melts in your mouth.  The coconut curry chicken was delicious as well.
I'm not generally a big fan of Caribbean food (nor have I had a lot of experience either) but I quite liked Mango's entrees. Their curried goat and jerked chicken were fantastic. In fact, the chicken was cooked so well, that the meat melted off the bone. Very tasty. Beware, though, their food is uber spicy and there's no air condition in the cafe.
Very impressed with the caliber of the food here. I thought this would be a bust since it wasn't too busy but this place is great. The food is very flavorful and fresh. Shrimp wraps are fantastic, comes with great condiments and roti. The jerk chicken rice was out of this world. Coconut milk and spices worked so well together and the portion was huge. As a Cal alum, I have to say Stanford has it way better in terms of food selection.
Jerk Chicken wrap was great, loved the wrap/red bean rice/guac/and of course the chicken.  Super moist and full of flavour.  Goat curry was good as well.  The rice was awesome and had a hint of coconut flavour.
3 1/2 stars constant reggae in the background is a good setting for this place, lil darker then coconuts, bar offers great drinks, food is really good portions are decent, price is same as coconuts. what makes this place is the music, i can sit there just listening to the music play for hours dont have to eat haha, but there appetizers are good and main dishes also good. if you like spicy order the habenero shrimp if you are a fanatic for oxtail try there version it is really tender comes close but it is no "back-a-yard" portion is also decent again not as much as Back-a-Yard offers food *** 1/2 service **** ambiance ***** music makes this place a 5 but due to the food only 3 1/2
Solid Jamaican food.  Not an enormous selection of tastes, but what they have (e.g. jerk chicken) is quite good.  And you have to get one of their smoothies served in a huge glass.
Food is very tasty, espeically with mango chutney! And like others have said, don't forget to try the smoothies.
Ya Man, Island Fever! We be Jamaican!  One of my favorite spots to eat in PA. It's healthy and Jah says "people, enjoy your meal with an ice cold Red Strip." Great service, reasonable prices, delicious island food. The jerk chicken sandwich is a grubbin healthy lunch. The Tobago chicken dish is totally grubbin, and the fritters, they actually have a name I can't remember, and the bread pudding is killer too.
Yikes.  Am I the only person who didn't like Mango Cafe? I was in Palo Alto and decided to pop in for a quick meal. The food was cheap and flavorful as promised.  I had the jerk chicken and mango tea.  I also had some roti bread.  First, I would not call it healthy.  The chicken was dark meat only and swimming in a pool of fat from the skin.  On the side was a mouthful of sad looking greens.  Second, I was expecting something better.  I had a friend who used to make homemade jerk chicken - her grandma's recipe.   In comparison to that, Mango's jerk chicken seemed like a cheap knock-off.  Maybe the other dishes are better?  I hope so.
Not bad.  I'd give it a 3.5 if there were half stars because of the service and the ambiance (I'm big on that, I've noticed), except their prices are reasonable, so maybe that justifies what I don't like about the restaurant.  I enjoyed the Tobago Special and their guava juice.  My friend ordered their housemade sangria, which was made with white wine and melon!!  Exotic!
I haven't been here since the latest change in management, but it sounds like the same great recipe is still in effect for most of the dishes.
I have been eating here for several years now and have always enjoyed their flavorful Rotis and spicy Jerked Chicken. I think they had a change in ownership and since then, their portions have become smaller and their dishes have become more bland.
So I'e never had jamaican food before so I found this place pretty fun based on availability in my life span.  Kinda small but it was a cute place and Palo Alto was a lot warmer then the city so sitting outside was a choice.  I had the oxtail which I loved.  Portions were huge and I could barely finish anything.  The drinks were fruity and watered down, just the way I like them since I'm not a big drinker.
I've never been to the Caribbean so I don't have a true standard to compare by but I tried the jerk chicken and thought it was OK here.  Tender and tears apart nicely but not very tasty.  I personally think the jerk chicken at Primo Patio is alot more flavorful even though the quality of the chicken itself may not be as high.  Sangria was good but I think extremely watered down.  Or maybe I was so hungry that all the food in my stomach slowed the alcohol absorption.
The no problem man soup is reason for all 4 stars. That and anyplace that serves plaintains. Service and atmosphere both lovely!  Drinks could use improving still -- will keep trying. Wouldn't order the roti again, but definitely enjoyed the Jerk chicken.
Really neat food. Definitely worth a try if you have never sampled Jamaican food. Be sure to try some of their drinks as well!
if you like jerk chicken, this is seriously the spot!!  so many different hot sauces to choose from too.  this place was originally started by some caribbean islanders.  though they no longer own it, the recipes and good food is still there! 19-Mar-07 update: under different ownership now, and has been renamed mango caribbean.  i found the food was not as good as the old mango cafe.  i rate mango caribbean at 3 stars.  my review is on that page.
I'm so conflicted. I want to write my review here with everyone else, but Mango Cafe has changed to Mango Caribbean restaurant. So if you want to see more reviews, go there http://www.yelp.com/biz/...
Despite the cool decor, the reggae music, friendly (but slow service).... I think I can speak for everyone in our group that we will never come back to this place for a meal.  Their food was absolutely horrendous AWFUL! One person went as far as to ask, is this DOG food?? THAT dish, my friends... was the beef curry dish. (please don't ask me what it was called on the menu because they had funny names i.e. Soon Come)  The beef was extremely dry, so when you bit into it, you had to drink something to make it go down.  The curry was bland; the rice it came with the dish must've been old because it had really hard rice pieces and I had to spit them out.  A few others ordered the Oxtail dish - sounded really good - but was a big disappointment again.  At least the oxtail wasn't as dry or tough like the beef, but it had absolutely NO flavor.  I ordered the Snapper dish and that was probably the only thing that was good - it was OK.  Even tho it actually wasn't that good, it seemed good because all the other dishes everyone else ordered sucked so bad.  Oh, so many people ordered the Jerk chicken? and they thought it was just ok... better than the beef and the oxtail.  One other person had the shrimp curry dish, which was also not as bad as the others - so this dish turned out to be edible.  Their drinks are not as bad as the food - a pitcher of "over-priced" Sangria is not too bad and their Mango Mojito is not bad. Their appetizer - the beef patty thing was not bad, actually, but their shrimp apptizers?  They have two kinds - the BBQ and the Spicy Pepper.... DON'T order these.  All they were... were like 5 or 6 pieces of shrimp dipped in 1)bbq sauce and 2)incredibly spicy sauce.  Seriously - NOT worth the 8 bux or whatever they charge for it. Overall, if you are just going for drinks and atmosphere~ cool.  Just don't EAT there.  I woke up with a stomach ache... seriously.
This place is about average. I wouldn't say this food is bad, but not great either. I had the jerked chicken, which was very tender, but I didn't like the jerk sauce. I'd say it's extremely overspiced, which gave me an upset stomach afterwords. I didn't like the steamed veggies that came with the meal, it seemed like a side that would come with a TV dinner. Yuck!
I love this place!  I lived in Fort Lauderdale for 2 years and had some real authentic Jamaican food.  I love the goat curry spicy - made with real scotch bonnet peppers.  Mangoes is the closest bar, so we are there a lot.  Also as I understand it, mangoes is  owned by  Winston and Greg.  Winston is Jamaican,  who used to be a soccer star in Jamaica.
I have been to the old mango (mango Cafe) and the new one (Mango Caribbean Restaurant & Bar) which I have to say is much improved.  The place is not huge, but I wouldn't call it cramped.  Cozy.  And not just spatially, the service, food and drinks are all unique and definitely up to par.  The owners, Greg and Winston really make me and all my guests feel welcome with their friendliness and company.  The servers are also very nice and attentive, even the chef knows me by name and comes out to say hi.  This is a great place for dinner parties or a date.  The laid back atmosphere does kinda feel like you're in the islands, and the drinks are ever-refreshing.  Greg concocts some tasty shots and they also have the 24 ounce red stripes which is cool.  The Rasta Pasta is my favorite dinner dish, but some of the other really good items on the menu are; Starters: Jerk Joints (Jerk Drumsticks mmmmm), Plantain Chips (With a great sauce), Mobay Shrimp (HOT!) Salads/Sandwiches: The Boston Bay Style BBQ Jerk Chicken sandwich is among my favorites.  Jerk Chicken, Avocado, Lettuce, Tomato, caramelized onions and a really good BBQ sauce on triple decker whole wheat! (I had this tonight) They also cater! Anyways, I could go on but I'm getting hungry again.  Do yourself a favor and check this place out, it's fun, and contrary to what some others have said, the prices are totally reasonable.
We went on a Sunday night and luckily got there a bit early as it became busy after we arrived.  The boss sat the two of us in a little alcove off to the left which had three tables and three candles lighting each table.  My wife found it a bit dark and hard to read the menu,  but some would consider it romantic.  I thought it would be a nice private area for a group as large as 12-14. The waitress was really working hard and serving many tables she did an efficient job.  I ordered the "port antonio"  a stew of beef with beans and an interesting bean sauce that results from the cooking the beans. It had a rich thick consistency, mild in taste.  Came with salad and rice to round out the meal.  My wife ordered the snapper and let me taste it, luckily for me since it was moist inside and obviously fresh fish.  Also the snapper comes with vegetables which the menu claimed to be sweet and tangy.
went here with one of the girls for my birthday dinner and i absolutely love the atmosphere, the music (very sean paul), and, of course, the food!  i wasn't sure what caribbean food really entailed, but i was definitely pleasantly surprised. we started out with the welcome hall, which is fried banana chips that come with a cucumber dip and also a guacamole dip.  yummy!! for my entree i had the reggae wrap (just as tasty as it sounds) -- jerk chicken in a pita bread wrap with sour cream and guacamole and, of course, cheese!  it was great! the chicken was tender, spicy, and very flavorful and it went well with the pita and the green-ish dip they give you (not quite sure what it is).  for dessert, we got a fried banana with coconut ice cream and chocolate dressing -- delicious. all in all, it was a great experience--from the festive atmosphere of the small restaurant to the flavorful food.  i can't wait until i'm around mango again so i can stop in and have some more tasty food!
I think this place is delicious. I've been twice, and was totally satisfied each time.  The fruit salad dessert is incredible, if you're into fruit.  The plantain chips appetizer was very tasty, and the chips come covered in salt &pepper which I love.  The waitress was very friendly both times, and willing to make the annoying specifications I requested with my food (ie, different dressing, on the side, etc etc).  I've already been here twice and will definitely go back!
ok so i haven't eaten here and haven't tried all their menu items- but 4 stars for this establishment because: 1) the owner/dudes at the restaurant are super friendly and helpful 2) the chicken patty appetizer is OFF THE HOOK yummy 3) shrimp + plaintains were yummy 4) prices are reasonable and the food was good 5) location is great as it's right across the street from where i work will definitely be back there again to try other items.  i'm going to slowly work up the nerve to get one of those rum smoothies to-go so i can sip away at work... NO ONE WOULD KNOW!
Bleh! No thanks! Came here for drinks and an appetizer after a few friends recommended it. I don't have anything good to say. The chicken wings were sitting in a plate of water. They had zero flavor and the meat fell off the bone (not how I want my chicken wings). The drinks were nothing special. With Coconuts down the street I'm not sure why you would ever come to this place. No thanks!
Interesting Carribean / Jamaican Food.  Limited repertoire, but worth experiencing.
Very tasty, simple food, doesn't cost an arm and a leg.  I went on Thursday night, when they have $2 red stripes, so that was a bonus.  They actually had these 24oz bottles of red stripe for $4 that I had never seen before too, very funny looking bottles (huge fat bottle with the same tiny opening signature to red stripe). But I only had one beer, so that's obviously not the point :)  I had their flag ship jerk chicken plate that came with very very tender jerk spiced chicken presented on a red cabbage leaf, some rice, and some steamed vegetables.  The chicken was soo tender, it reminded me of fall off the bone ribs, really never had meat so tender aside from excellent bbq.  The spice was peppery and flavorful, not too spicy.  They brought out an array of hot sauces too for those who wanted more spice. The rice and beans on the side was a little too buttery for my taste, but still a nice complement to the spicy chicken. I had some of my wife's jerk chicken quesadilla, and that was good too. I liked the atmosphere a lot, aside form the huge tv above the bar.  But we were seated further in the restaurant underneath this structure that had bead curtains going in.
I would almost give it a 4-star. Since it is our 1st visit, we'll review it again to see if it'll get bumped up. Our Order: Plaintain Chips Breezy Caribbean Wrap Reggae Platter The dips that come with the Plaintain Chips are might tasty. The plaintains were simple, but it didn't need much more. The wraps are "assemble yourself" and looked quite plain and serving size might be on the small size for dinner, but it actually was quite tasty.  Even more so if you use the Plaintain dips.  It's definitely a dish if you want to eat healthy. As for the Reggae Platter, the portion was great. The chicken was tender, but it was more baked-style than off the grill (Probably the reason why it's more tender).  My husband prefers the grilled style. To me, it seemed quite satisfactory. The rice was a bit on the dry side, but that's probably because I'm used to really wet red beans & rice.  Nonetheless, it was decent. Overall, the dishes were satisfactory and it was priced right. The service was really friendly and our water was always refilled. The ambience is really relaxed and inviting with warm jamaican music playing.
Very tasty restaurant. I would definitely want to go again and that's really what matters most, isn't it? Ordered some Black Pepper Shrimp which was good. The music was fun (steel drum version of pop songs) and the drinks were strong. Certain days had some discount appetizers and beer too which is always good. The mojito had a too much mint for my liking but I guess that really just depends on who's drinking it, right? Next time I HAVE to try the jerk chicken. I didn't realize that was what Jamaican/Caribbean food was known for. From my experience it was definitely a restaurant any American can enjoy and isn't anywhere near as exotic and foreign as I thought.
I really wanted to like this place considering my new quest to try jerk chicken at different places since I was newly introduced to it.  My friend and I were looking at the menu outside and the bartender came out and nicely welcomed us in.  I would think service would be kinda snotty since this place is in Palo Alto and near University but service was great!  And that's why the 3 stars... If you've eaten at Back-A-Yard, the jerk chicken here is nothing like that.  Here it seemed to have more of the spices than flavor, meaning the spice was there but that's all there was...a slight tingle in the mouth but with no flavor.  And this is for the Jerk Chicken platter ($12) and for the appetizer drumsticks. My friend had the ox-tail which he loved and was recommended by our waitress.  If you like ox-tail, I think that's a winner, but I'm not too fond of eating a tail. And like the other reviews, the appetizer spicy pepper shrimp was the best.  It had the most flavor and was pretty damn spicy I was sweating.  The plantains it came with were good too...but with 6 bitty shrimp, a lump of rice, and a few slices of plantain for $8 is a little much. ...IF I do come back, I would order something else that wasn't jerk chicken.
Love the chill setting & music...plus the habanero shrimp are delicious!
Very tasty food. I had the mango shrimp and plantain chips. My friend ordered the mango wrap and it was so good, I had to order it for take out along with the bread pudding that comes with a lot of caramel sauce. Just the way I like it , oh and vanilla bean ice cream. I can't wait to go back and try the empanadas. I hear they are on the sweet side. Um good.
If you miss this place, you have not lived. Best Jamaincan food outside Kingston. HIGHLY recommend!
This is one of my local favorites and has been since I was a kid.  Though it has not been owned or ran by Jamaicans for about 15 years now, the food is great and the service excellent.  I just got back from my second trip to Jamaica and will honestly say that Mango's has the second best Jerk Chicken I have ever had.  Just about everything on the menu is delicious, but be carefull, most of it is super spicy (temperture varies from night to night).  I would recomend the "reggae" combination which includes 10 awesome jerk chicken joints (legs) a green salad and two patties with your choice of chicken or beef.  If you are a little hungrier get the "whole island" which will give you 5 jerked and 5 curried joints, a patty of your choice and some rice with chicken pellou.  I over heard someone refer to this combo as "a flaming iron fist wrapped in a silk glove"-I couldn't agree more.  There are plenty of other choices ranging from curried goat to fried plantane, all delicious.  Make sure to order a smoothie from the extensive list, I'd recomend either the treasure bay or the Kingston. The ambience is alot cooler than the food with the easy reggae music and plenty of jamaican art and pictures.  Mango Cafe is a great place for lunch or dinner, business or pleasure.  Make sure you check it out. Rasta!
A little bit of the caribbean right in my own backyard. This place is one of my favorite restaurants to come to. The food, music, decor and drinks are all great. My favorite is the jerk chicken roti wrap. It comes with a variety of sauces, red beans and rice and a salad. The jerk chicken has just the right amount of spice for me (i do like my spicy food). And if i am craving a bit more, this place has awesome imported hot sauce, beware, the hot sauce is not for the weak.
For me, it has been hard to find good roti in my area.  So, finding Mango has been a blessing.  The roti is good but not always consistent.  $2 Red Strip on Thursday and Saturdays is hard to beat and I can get beef patties.  The Ox Tail soup is good as is the jerk chicken.  Service is good to average.  I'd give them four stars if it was more consistent.
i went after it became "mango carribean" instead of just "mango cafe" to see if it was any different i honestly say, i liked it better before. before, i would order a few patties and a smoothie (those smoothies were HUGE) now, i still get the patties, but theyre slightly smaller and more expensive. the smoothies are smaller and more expensive too. if you do go there, i reccomend the treasure beach smoothie (yum). i would rather go to back a yard.
Wow - went here last night with friends and we all absolutely LOVED it! One of our party actually had the goat and ate all of it.  I had the jerked chicken roti plate that was the perfect portion, very interesting, and healthy.  The place was jammed at 8:15 on a Wed night. I'll be back and it is so nice to find a fun, reasonable place in PA with good food! Casual Fun just like the Islands
I ordered the Boston Bay Style sandwich, which is jerk chicken and caramalized onions. The portion is small and inide the sandwich is tomato and avocado. There's no mention of this on the menu, so if yiou're allergic to it or just dont like it, you're in for a surprise. The decor is ugly with darks colors which darken the restaurant and the music is so loud, it's hard to talk.
Love the soup!  It's the best remedy for a cold.  Winston couldn't be a nicer guy and we love supporting his restaurant.  Try it out!
Great place to go on Thurs nights $2 red stripe! Hooray Beer! Great jerk chicken.
Stumbled on this place by accident (NOT all accidents are a bad thing)! Outside dining, great drinks, great food (we all sampled each others plates) If you like a little kick, and a really relaxing evening, this is the place for you.
I love their Mango champagne! Happy Hours every Thursday! What a treat!
This restaurant is located at a great place. It is on Hamilton, right next to the University Ave. It has Great food. Super delicious. Definitely try their mango chicken wrap!
Smoothies way too watery... Feels almost like juice mixed with ice. A friend ordered jerk salmon, said was fantastic; I had jerk chicken, thought was good but far from great.
Nice smallish local place in P.A. Good place to catch-up over dinner w your buddies on a Wednesday night after work.
We just went on a Saturday evening and it was quite crowded.  The service was OK, but we waited a while to have our order taken and then  notice people who arrived after we did got their food first.  Not a big deal.  The ginger beer was a treat.  It tasted homemade and the sharp ginger flavor lingered.  The food was a disappointment.  The filling in my Roti was bland, just chicken stewed in something resembling cornstarch.  It was OK, just not great. I still may give it another chance.  The ambiance was nice and they have a good Thursday happy hour.  But Back-A-Yard wins the Palo Alto Caribbean contest.
Went here the other night for dinner. The owner is such a sweetheart and very attentive, I wish I could say it was awesome, but, sadly, it's not. We had the plantains appetizer which was delicious and their drinks were great.  My sandwich -- the Retirement (salmon with avocado) -- was delightful but a tad over-priced since it was not very large (too much bread).  The rice was great -- hot, flavorful with coconut and beans. My boyfriend had a chicken sandwich (I cannot remember if it was the jerk or the bbq) which he thought was tasty but, again, over-priced for what you got. The waitress was very sweet but awful.  We were seated a good time before the other tables around us and yet their appetizers (one the exact same order as ours) came out before ours.  The same happened for their entrees.  Very slow for us, although, apparently not for others...hm.
Ate here for a late-night dinner. Very strong Caribbean theme - fruity drinks, thematic menu, pleasantly laid-back staff, the dishes are all a narrow range of chicken / shrimp.  The food works, though is unspectacular.  My principle complaint is the lack of options that aren't, um, jerk chicken. Would probably hit the spot on a lazy, hot summer day.  Less so on a cold rainy night.
They have the most amazing ginger beer here.  So gingery!  Not too sweet at all! The beef patty was delicious and amazingly flavorful, too. Decor is clean and cheerful. Service was very attentive. Scotch bonnet sauces galore.
The quality of the food has declined substantially over the past few years. The service is generally slow - on my last visit there was only one other table present yet the waiter was inattentive. The jerk chicken was lackluster and lukewarm. I do enjoy the desserts, especially the fried banana.
This place used to be good with previous owners,  They served real Caribbean food,  The new owners serve very americanized version that is bland and has no authentic flavor or feeling.  The restaurant has become more of a drinking joint with americanized food with emphasis on, yet again, americanized alcoholic smoothies and punches.  Food however sucks.
This is horrible place for carribean food.  It used to be owned by carribean family and they had... Read more 
yu to the um to the delicious!!
this is one of the placest in with the most sincerest service in palo alto.  in stanfurd country there are too many snooty places that don't really deserve to be around.  however, the staff here is really nice.  i love how they have the tables on the sidewalk patio.  they let us bring our cute, well-behaved jindo and gave her a paper bowl of water.  we first fond out about this place because of the entertainment book discount.  it was a _great_ deal. my wife ordered the raggamuffin style - the oxtail dish.  i ordered the trindad special with goat.  we were surprised at how similar this cuisine was to south asian and some southeast asian cuisines.  i mean, we're no experts with caribbean food, but we sure eat a lot of south asian food.  one earlier reviewer said he or she _heard_ that this food was americanised for the palo altoan palate.  i honestly don't know.  however, the roti was like a south/southeast asian roti.  the on-bone goat had an asian-ish curry sauce with potatoes.  the red beans and rice and sauteed vegetables were a little less asian.  the oxtail was pretty good.  the meat there as in the trinidad goat was fall-of-the-bone tender.  i suppose they stew this stuff for a long time.  both were really good.  i also ordered a black and tan - which is guiness and red stripe instead of bass ale.  pretty cool!  my wife ordered a bahama mama, and i'm glad they have these blended drinks. overall, it was a very enjoyable experience; so i'm giving them a 4-star rating.  (if you know me, i very rarely give _restaurants_ five stars, and four stars is very good.)
Since I had been quite a fan of the old Mango Cafe, I was initially suspicious of the new management...but was pleasantly surprised with both the face lift the space got and the delicious fare.  The staff is extremely friendly and always recognize us and chat with us as we are seated.  The island paradise vibe complete with a tiki like bar, fishing nets over head, and great reggae music immediately melts away stress.  Drinks are delicious....they are serving soju mixed drinks and the mojito was delicious!  I typically order the rasta pea cook off with a side of roti bread.  It is true that the roti on its own is not particularly flavorful, but is excellent with a saucy meal.  I have also had plantain chips (good appetizer) the Tobago Special (great coconutty Chicken Pelau) and the jerk chicken sandwich on sour dough bread(also delicious and comes with a great simple salad with a vinaigrette dressing).   I have heard good things about red stripe happy hour and steel drums on some nights but I've never had the chance to check that out....it is certainly on my list though!  My only problem with the new Mango Cafe is that it is slightly more expensive so we can't go quite as often as we would like, but that I suppose I can deal with.
The first time I had food from Mango I was less then impressed... My BF had gone out to dinner with his sister and brought me back what looked like food he had gone out and hunted.... A huge amount of Chicken with not much flavor... kinda dry and it basically just kind of grossed me out. So when I was told we were going there again with his whole family this time, I was less then thrilled..... You truly feel like you are on a tropical vacation in Jamaica when you walk into this place....Ambiance adds a lot to restaurants.... So with an open mind and an empty stomach I opened the menu and felt inspired.... I actually couldn't decide on what to have because so many things sounded good.... I eventually settled on the Jamerican Special which is kinda of like veggie Jamaican fajitas.... sooooo good with Roti bread and a magical dill sauce that I could drink straight..... There were lots of vegetarian choices (which I have been tending towards as of late) ... A must try is the plantain chips with cucumber honey dipping sauce.... So Yummy!
my friends and i went and found mango to be just ok. the roti turned out to be a tortilla, and the smoothies, which we had been craving, were a bit watered down. i'm not sure what jamaican food is, but we all thought it tasted like thick japanese curry wrapped in a tortilla. it's okay if you're just looking for something to gnosh on, but nothing really spectacular.
This cafe is a medium to small sized dim restaurant with a tropical atmosphere. I came here with a group of friends for dinner on a Thursday night and we waited about 20 mins. There are "rooms" that can be reserved for large groups but other than that I wouldn't necessarily consider this as a convenient place to go for a large group (6 or more people). The drinks are good, I'd recommend getting one of the smoothies, for $3 bucks it's a great deal. I thought the food was okay, I got the Grand Cayman Special which is the mango chicken. The chicken was kind of dry. I also go the No Problem Man jerk chicken soup which I would recommend. The soup was very flavorful and perfect for cold weather. We also shared the plantains (Welcome Hall) which I highly recommend. It was crispy fried bananas with salsa dip. My friend got the ox tail (Raggamuffin style) which was very tasty although maybe a bit too much sauce. I'd recommend the oxtail as an entree. Overall this place was okay, I'm not sure I'd come back again though.
I ordered Roti to start, which after tasting Strait's roti, left a lot to be desired.  I ordered the vegetarian Tobago (sp?) which was vegetables in a coconut milk.  I guess it was ok.  I ended up dousing it in the special hot sauce the give you.  The real jewel of the meal (and the true purpose of the visit) was the bread pudding.  I actually only stumbled upon this place as I walked by days ago, and was forced to check it out after following the delicious aroma of bread pudding wafting out of the place.  he bread pudding is drowning in this delicious carmelized gooey substance.  HOWEVER....they pair it with mango ice cream, whihc is simply not ok.  You need a vanilla bean or rum flavor instead.  I understood the motive, but it didn't fly.  Oh, and I ordered coffee, which was allegedly the famous quality Jamaica Blue Mountain, which was anything BUT quality, and the waitress looked at me puzzled when I asked for half and half with my coffee.  She acted as if she had parted the Red Sea in managing to locate some 2% milk for me.
For cheap good good this and Andale are my two go-to places.  The jerked chicken is *hot* but great.  Their roti dishes are also delicious.  They also have an extensive drink list (my favorite is their sorrel drink)
i like being able to sit outside, but a lot of the food is too spicy for me and i haven't been incredibly impressed with it otherwise. the one supergreat point are the huuuuge smoothies - more than big enough to share and incredibly delicious.
The place is tiny inside, but they have tables on the sidewalk that are nice.  We went on a Saturday, and they had a steel drum player who was really good.  The food wasn't great, but it was good- jerk chicken, and jerk shrimp with plaintains, and red beans and rice.  The prices are not cheap, but the atmosphere, the service, and the food are worth it.
Mango is one block off of University so sadly it does not get as much play as it really should.  I stumbled across it because it absolutely started pouring rain one day last Winter when I was walking to the bank from my office & I ran inside Mango for shelter.  I wound up having a seat and eating lunch. EXCELLENT!  Really slow (relaxed is a better word) but really friendly service.  I felt so at peace in there. Just like on the Carribbean Islands!  The atmosphere is cute and they really do capture the Carib culture as best they can with the music, lighting and other decor.  The food though is to die for.  Yes, I love food so much  I might just die for it.  My fave is the Reggae Wrap and the No Problem Man! soup. Take yourself off University Ave....forget the mainstream trendy spots for a minute. Let's be honest, you won't miss much. Try Mango. Prices are reasonable, it's small, intimate and you'll find parking.
GREAT food.  Fantastic jerk chicken.  If you're feeling adventurous, go for the curried goat.  The smoothies are served in a huge, goldfish bowl sized goblet, but a bit watered down.  Every time I've gone it's been rather empty but it's a nice, relaxing very colorful atmosphere.
I have been going here since 2002.  It used to be food that I loved and craved.  All I could think about was the roti and salad.  Over the years the owners have changed and while the menu looks similar, the recipes are obviously different.  I can't say I would recommend it now.
I've been here now 3 times and each time it seems to get better and better. While I am not a fan of spicier food (such as jerk seasoning), I have never had a hard time finding something mild and enjoyable. I have had the mango chicken 2 times - once on a sandwhich and once on the plate with rice, beans and veggies. Either way, this mild mannered dish is subtly flavored and extremely tender (I did add salt as I have a bit of a salt addiction, but I appreciated the flavor of the chicken even without it...why we are so spice-obsessed that we don't even taste the food beneath it anymore is beyond me). They must slow cook the chicken or something because it's so juicy and so tender it melts in your mouth. The veggies were green beans, onions, and bell peppers steamed and covered in some kind of butter, but still also flavorful and delicious. Also, the service has always been good even though they have a small staff. I highly recommend the plantain chips which are a lot different than fried plantains - these are almost like long strips of banana chips, but the dipping sauces are amazing. They also have a wide variety of nectars, teas, etc. to choose from. I especially like the coconut-pineapple nectar (like an unfrozen Pina Colada without the hangover). Super good food. I will definitely be back soon!
Oh My God!! Whatever happened to the good ol' Mango Cafe?? The food absolutely sucks under the new management. I WANT the old chef back, PLEASE...... I payed 15 bucks for an unappetizing plate of goat curry over rice. Drove all the way home thinking about that spicy plate of melt-in-your- mouth goat curry I was going to devour on getting home, only to open up a plate of bland curry with stringy chewy goat and some tasteless boiled veggies thrown in...Renovating a place and over charging to cover the costs is ridiculous....If you do so at least make the food tasty, 'cause that's what really counts!!
I grant my stars sparingly but this is a great place to try if you've never been.  It's a classy cafe with outdoor seating in Palo Alto downtown, meaning, the atmosphere is great whether you're inside or out.  If you're a die-hard ginger fan I'd recommend trying the ginger beer, a house special.  But I think those who would enjoy this place the most are those who like meat.  Have it in pure form or in a sandwich or pasta - they'll make it really tasty & tender either way.  But you CANT come here without trying the Ox-Tail.  Its their special and the best I've had thus far.
This place is perfect for a no-frills caribbean meal.  The food is good, the staff is friendly.  My only complaint is that it's pricey for the entrees.  If it were a little less expensive, me and my bf would be in there every week.  BTW, it's a good place to have a fun, casual celebration because they've got a big table in a private-ish room that you can reserve.  I recommend the shrimp/beans/rice/plantains combo.  The cheap Red Stripe nights are fun.
Great food - jerk chicken and mango chicken are to die for....love this place.
I've been here twice and the food was mediocre.  Either over salty or not enough flavor.  The staff is really nice.  The first time the food was okay.  Then, I took my boyfriend and neither of our dishes were tasty.  We left disappointed.
Very disappointing.. When we arrived there was no welcome..when we left no "thank you" or anything. Not to mention the fact that the food was pretty bad. I can cook better food and I am an awful cook!! I ordered a glass of wine- big mistake! It tasted old and rotten so I didn't even finish it. And I didn't feel like "bothering" the waitress who already seemed annoyed that we were even there. Just a big waste of money and waste of a meal! If you want good jerk food, try Back a Yard or Coconuts.
I love the food and the casual atmosphere here. Each of their entrees are good, and I love the desserts. The banana forest is a common favorite amongst me and my friends.
Love this place! The food is great - I'm a huge fan of the reggae wrap but have also tried the soca special and great bay shrimp which are both good - the shrimp is very spicy, and the sauteed veggies that come with those are fresh and cooked perfectly. The bottled hot sauce really is hot though! I do kinda feel like I'm in Jamaica inside the restaurant, and the guy who runs the place is always uber friendly.
A hidden gem in DTPA, this Caribbean restaurant will allow you to have a romantic, colorful date while you enjoy delicious bites. Definitely go for some plantain chips, a smoothie, or anything with shrimp in it. Prices are reasonable, especially for the quantity of food.
